1676 | sit (verb): to be seated | loc: сидіти
  EN TS: Sitting with a coffee? Vibes.
  ua TS: Сидіти з кавою? Вайб.
  EN FS: Sitting with a book? Vibes.
  ua FS: Сидіти з книжкою? Вайб.
  EN TP: sitting in an armchair
  ua TP: сидить у кріслі
  EN FP: sitting at a desk
  ua FP: сидить за столом
1677 | city (noun): a large crowded area of streets and buildings | loc: місто
  EN TS: They are not looking at the city.
  ua TS: Вони не дивляться на місто.
  EN FS: They are not looking at their phones.
  ua FS: Вони не дивляться у свої телефони.
  EN TP: a city at dusk
  ua TP: місто в сутінках
  EN FP: a city at noon
  ua FP: місто опівдні
1679 | temple (noun): a building where people pray | loc: храм
  EN TS: The temple is golden.
  ua TS: Храм золотий.
  EN FS: The temple is silver.
  ua FS: Храм срібний.
  EN TP: a temple by a pond
  ua TP: храм біля ставка
  EN FP: a temple in a city
  ua FP: храм у місті
1681 | peacock (noun): a large bird with a long shiny blue-green tail | loc: павич
  EN TS: What a long tail, peacock!
  ua TS: Який довгий хвіст, павичу!
  EN FS: What a short tail, peacock!
  ua FS: Який короткий хвіст, павичу!
  EN TP: a peacock on a branch
  ua TP: павич на гілці
  EN FP: a peacock on the ground
  ua FP: павич на землі
1684 | mask (noun): a cover you wear over your face | loc: маска
  EN TS: Even the Mona Lisa wears a mask now.
  ua TS: Навіть Мона Ліза тепер у масці.
  EN FS: Even the Mona Lisa wears a hat now.
  ua FS: Навіть Мона Ліза тепер у капелюсі.
  EN TP: a white medical mask
  ua TP: біла медична маска
  EN FP: a mask for a party
  ua FP: маска для вечірки
1685 | crowd (noun): a large group of people packed together | loc: натовп
  EN TS: The crowd is running away!
  ua TS: Натовп тікає!
  EN FS: The crowd is running inside!
  ua FS: Натовп біжить усередину!
  EN TP: a crowd fleeing the temple
  ua TP: натовп тікає з храму
  EN FP: a crowd praying inside
  ua FP: натовп молиться всередині
1686 | charge (verb): to fill a phone or battery with electricity | loc: заряджати
  EN TS: He is charging himself.
  ua TS: Він заряджає сам себе.
  EN FS: He is charging his phone.
  ua FS: Він заряджає свій телефон.
  EN TP: charging from a wall socket
  ua TP: заряджається від розетки
  EN FP: charging a car battery
  ua FP: заряджає автомобільний акумулятор
1689 | jesus (noun): the central figure of the Christian faith | loc: Ісус
  EN TS: Jesus is standing by a cave.
  ua TS: Ісус стоїть біля печери.
  EN FS: Jesus is standing by a lake.
  ua FS: Ісус стоїть біля озера.
  EN TP: Jesus by a cave
  ua TP: Ісус біля печери
  EN FP: Jesus by the sea
  ua FP: Ісус біля моря
1693 | knight (noun): a soldier in metal armour from the Middle Ages | loc: лицар
  EN TS: A knight is swinging a sword.
  ua TS: Лицар розмахує мечем.
  EN FS: A knight is swinging an axe.
  ua FS: Лицар розмахує сокирою.
  EN TP: a knight in armour
  ua TP: лицар в обладунках
  EN FP: a knight on a horse
  ua FP: лицар на коні
1694 | chief (noun): the leader of a group or tribe | loc: вождь
  EN TS: The chief wears a feather.
  ua TS: Вождь носить перо.
  EN FS: The chief wears a crown.
  ua FS: Вождь носить корону.
  EN TP: a chief with a feather
  ua TP: вождь із пером
  EN FP: a chief with a crown
  ua FP: вождь із короною
1695 | gun (noun): a weapon that fires a bullet at high speed | loc: пістолет
  EN TS: She is holding a gun.
  ua TS: Вона тримає пістолет.
  EN FS: She is holding a phone.
  ua FS: Вона тримає телефон.
  EN TP: holding a gun down
  ua TP: тримає пістолет донизу
  EN FP: holding a gun up
  ua FP: тримає пістолет угору
1696 | eagle (noun): a large strong bird that hunts | loc: орел
  EN TS: The eagle manages two chicks.
  ua TS: Орел керує двома пташенятами.
  EN FS: The eagle manages four chicks.
  ua FS: Орел керує чотирма пташенятами.
  EN TP: an eagle above its nest
  ua TP: орел над гніздом
  EN FP: an eagle catching a fish
  ua FP: орел ловить рибу
1697 | fan (noun): a folding object you wave to move air | loc: віяло
  EN TS: Fan and kimono: very elegant.
  ua TS: Віяло й кімоно: дуже елегантно.
  EN FS: Book and kimono: very elegant.
  ua FS: Книжка й кімоно: дуже елегантно.
  EN TP: an open folding fan
  ua TP: розкрите віяло
  EN FP: an electric fan in summer
  ua FP: вентилятор улітку
1699 | swim (verb): to move through water with your body | loc: плавати
  EN TS: Someone is swimming to the music.
  ua TS: Хтось плаває під музику.
  EN FS: Someone is flying to the music.
  ua FS: Хтось літає під музику.
  EN TP: swimming across calm water
  ua TP: плаває в спокійній воді
  EN FP: swimming in a pool
  ua FP: плаває в басейні
1701 | lily (noun): a tall plant with big trumpet-shaped flowers | loc: лілія
  EN TS: A lily is growing from a jug.
  ua TS: Лілія росте з глечика.
  EN FS: A rose is growing from a jug.
  ua FS: Троянда росте з глечика.
  EN TP: a lily in a jug
  ua TP: лілія в глечику
  EN FP: a lily in a pond
  ua FP: лілія в ставку
1703 | read (verb): to look at written words and understand them | loc: читати
  EN TS: She is reading in the air.
  ua TS: Вона читає в повітрі.
  EN FS: She is sleeping in the air.
  ua FS: Вона спить у повітрі.
  EN TP: reading a glowing book
  ua TP: читає сяйливу книжку
  EN FP: reading a text message
  ua FP: читає повідомлення
1704 | christmas (noun): the winter holiday on 25 December | loc: Різдво
  EN TS: It says 'happy Christmas'.
  ua TS: Тут написано «З Різдвом».
  EN FS: It says 'happy birthday'.
  ua FS: Тут написано «З днем народження».
  EN TP: an old Christmas card
  ua TP: стара листівка на Різдво
  EN FP: an old Christmas tree
  ua FP: стара ялинка на Різдво
1706 | sunglasses (noun): dark spectacles that protect the eyes from the sun | loc: сонцезахисні окуляри
  EN TS: Cool dog, cool sunglasses.
  ua TS: Крутий пес, круті сонцезахисні окуляри.
  EN FS: Cool dog, cool hat.
  ua FS: Крутий пес, крута шапка.
  EN TP: a husky in sunglasses
  ua TP: хаскі в сонцезахисних окулярах
  EN FP: sunglasses on a beach towel
  ua FP: сонцезахисні окуляри на рушнику
1707 | cottage (noun): a small simple house in the countryside | loc: хатина
  EN TS: Plants are eating the cottage.
  ua TS: Рослини їдять хатину.
  EN FS: Plants are eating the church.
  ua FS: Рослини їдять церкву.
  EN TP: an overgrown stone cottage
  ua TP: зарісла кам'яна хатина
  EN FP: a cottage by the sea
  ua FP: хатина біля моря
1709 | teacher (noun): a person whose job is teaching | loc: учитель
  EN TS: The teacher is explaining.
  ua TS: Учитель пояснює.
  EN FS: The teacher is sleeping.
  ua FS: Учитель спить.
  EN TP: a teacher at the board
  ua TP: учитель біля дошки
  EN FP: a teacher at her desk
  ua FP: учитель за столом
1710 | blackboard (noun): a dark wall surface teachers write on in chalk | loc: дошка
  EN TS: The blackboard is empty.
  ua TS: Дошка порожня.
  EN FS: The blackboard is full.
  ua FS: Дошка вся списана.
  EN TP: an empty blackboard
  ua TP: порожня дошка
  EN FP: a blackboard full of notes
  ua FP: дошка, повна записів
1711 | skeleton (noun): all the bones of a body together | loc: скелет
  EN TS: The skeleton looks very happy.
  ua TS: Скелет виглядає дуже щасливим.
  EN FS: The skeleton looks very sad.
  ua FS: Скелет виглядає дуже сумним.
  EN TP: a skeleton with a bow
  ua TP: скелет із бантом
  EN FP: a skeleton in a museum
  ua FP: скелет у музеї
1713 | feather (noun): one of the light soft things covering a bird | loc: перо
  EN TS: Hundreds of feathers on top.
  ua TS: Сотні пер нагорі.
  EN FS: Hundreds of flowers on top.
  ua FS: Сотні квітів нагорі.
  EN TP: a headdress of long feathers
  ua TP: головний убір із довгих пер
  EN FP: a pillow full of feathers
  ua FP: подушка з пір'ям
1716 | spacesuit (noun): the sealed suit an astronaut wears in space | loc: скафандр
  EN TS: The spacesuit is white.
  ua TS: Скафандр білий.
  EN FS: The spacesuit is orange.
  ua FS: Скафандр помаранчевий.
  EN TP: a white spacesuit
  ua TP: білий скафандр
  EN FP: a spacesuit on a hanger
  ua FP: скафандр на вішаку
1717 | instrument (noun): an object you play to make music | loc: музичний інструмент
  EN TS: This instrument is a violin.
  ua TS: Цей музичний інструмент — скрипка.
  EN FS: This instrument is a guitar.
  ua FS: Цей музичний інструмент — гітара.
  EN TP: a string instrument
  ua TP: струнний музичний інструмент
  EN FP: a wind instrument
  ua FP: духовий музичний інструмент
1718 | calm (adjective): quiet, relaxed and not worried at all | loc: спокійний
  EN TS: The Buddha is 100 % calm.
  ua TS: Будда на 100 % спокійний.
  EN FS: The Buddha is 100 % angry.
  ua FS: Будда на 100 % злий.
  EN TP: a calm face
  ua TP: спокійне обличчя
  EN FP: a calm sea
  ua FP: спокійне море
1724 | hold (verb): to have something in your hands or grip | loc: тримати
  EN TS: She is holding the moon!
  ua TS: Вона тримає місяць!
  EN FS: She is holding the sun!
  ua FS: Вона тримає сонце!
  EN TP: holding the moon
  ua TP: тримає місяць
  EN FP: holding a poppy
  ua FP: тримає мак
1725 | cross (noun): two crossed beams used to crucify someone | loc: хрест
  EN TS: A cross lies on the ground.
  ua TS: Хрест лежить на землі.
  EN FS: A ladder lies on the ground.
  ua FS: Драбина лежить на землі.
  EN TP: a cross on the ground
  ua TP: хрест на землі
  EN FP: a cross on a church
  ua FP: хрест на церкві
1726 | cape (noun): a loose sleeveless coat hanging from the shoulders | loc: накидка
  EN TS: She is swirling a red cape.
  ua TS: Вона крутить червону накидку.
  EN FS: She is swirling a red scarf.
  ua FS: Вона крутить червоний шарф.
  EN TP: swirling a red cape
  ua TP: крутить червону накидку
  EN FP: wearing a cape and mask
  ua FP: у накидці й масці
1728 | fan (noun): a folding object you wave to move air | loc: віяло
  EN TS: Red fan up, leg up!
  ua TS: Червоне віяло вгору, нога вгору!
  EN FS: Red hat up, leg up!
  ua FS: Червоний капелюх угору, нога вгору!
  EN TP: waving a red fan
  ua TP: махає червоним віялом
  EN FP: a fan on the ceiling
  ua FP: вентилятор на стелі
1729 | pet (noun): an animal kept at home for company | loc: домашній улюбленець
  EN TS: She has two pets.
  ua TS: У неї два домашні улюбленці.
  EN FS: She has three pets.
  ua FS: У неї три домашні улюбленці.
  EN TP: a girl with her pets
  ua TP: дівчина з домашніми улюбленцями
  EN FP: a girl buying a pet
  ua FP: дівчина купує домашнього улюбленця
1731 | arrow (noun): the thin feathered stick you shoot from a bow | loc: стріла
  EN TS: An arrow hit her flag!
  ua TS: Стріла влучила в її прапор!
  EN FS: An arrow hit her horse!
  ua FS: Стріла влучила в її коня!
  EN TP: arrows in a flag
  ua TP: стріли в прапорі
  EN FP: arrows in a target
  ua FP: стріли в мішені
1733 | elf (noun): a magical creature with pointed ears | loc: ельф
  EN TS: Guess what the elf is holding? A light.
  ua TS: Вгадай, що тримає ельф? Світло.
  EN FS: Guess what the elf is holding? A sword.
  ua FS: Вгадай, що тримає ельф? Меч.
  EN TP: an elf with pointed ears
  ua TP: ельф із гострими вухами
  EN FP: an elf with a bow
  ua FP: ельф із луком
1734 | superhero (noun): a caped character with special powers | loc: супергерой
  EN TS: This superhero is Spider-Man.
  ua TS: Цей супергерой — Людина-павук.
  EN FS: This superhero is Batman.
  ua FS: Цей супергерой — Бетмен.
  EN TP: a superhero in a mask
  ua TP: супергерой у масці
  EN FP: a superhero with a cape
  ua FP: супергерой у плащі
1738 | veil (noun): a piece of cloth that covers the head | loc: вуаль
  EN TS: She wears a long dark veil.
  ua TS: Вона в довгій темній вуалі.
  EN FS: She wears a long white veil.
  ua FS: Вона в довгій білій вуалі.
  EN TP: a long dark veil
  ua TP: довга темна вуаль
  EN FP: a wedding veil
  ua FP: весільна вуаль
1741 | emperor (noun): the man who rules a whole empire | loc: імператор
  EN TS: The emperor wears a wreath.
  ua TS: Імператор носить вінок.
  EN FS: The emperor wears a crown.
  ua FS: Імператор носить корону.
  EN TP: an emperor with a wreath
  ua TP: імператор із вінком
  EN FP: an emperor on a horse
  ua FP: імператор на коні
1742 | shield (noun): a flat piece of armour held for protection | loc: щит
  EN TS: The angel is holding a shield.
  ua TS: Ангел тримає щит.
  EN FS: The angel is holding a sword.
  ua FS: Ангел тримає меч.
  EN TP: a large round shield
  ua TP: великий круглий щит
  EN FP: a shield on the ground
  ua FP: щит на землі
1743 | italy (noun): a country in southern Europe, home of pizza | loc: Італія
  EN TS: Ice cream in Italy? Of course.
  ua TS: Морозиво в Італії? Аякже.
  EN FS: Pizza in Italy? Of course.
  ua FS: Піца в Італії? Аякже.
  EN TP: a leaning tower in Italy
  ua TP: похила вежа в Італії
  EN FP: a pizza oven in Italy
  ua FP: піч для піци в Італії
1747 | tent (noun): a shelter of cloth stretched over poles | loc: намет
  EN TS: Best tent spot ever!
  ua TS: Найкраще місце для намету в житті!
  EN FS: Best beach spot ever!
  ua FS: Найкраще місце на пляжі в житті!
  EN TP: a tent on a hill
  ua TP: намет на пагорбі
  EN FP: a tent on a beach
  ua FP: намет на пляжі
1751 | sign (noun): a big board that shows advertisements | loc: вказівник
  EN TS: Each sign shows a landscape.
  ua TS: Кожен вказівник показує пейзаж.
  EN FS: Each sign shows a city.
  ua FS: Кожен вказівник показує місто.
  EN TP: arrow signs with landscapes
  ua TP: вказівники-стрілки з пейзажами
  EN FP: arrow signs with prices
  ua FP: вказівники-стрілки з цінами
1752 | windmill (noun): a building with big sails turned by the wind | loc: вітряк
  EN TS: The windmill windows are lit.
  ua TS: Вікна вітряка світяться.
  EN FS: The windmill windows are open.
  ua FS: Вікна вітряка відчинені.
  EN TP: a windmill by a lake
  ua TP: вітряк біля озера
  EN FP: a windmill in a field
  ua FP: вітряк у полі
1756 | argue (verb): to speak angrily with someone you disagree with | loc: сваритися | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They are arguing on the phone.
  ua TS: Вони сваряться по телефону.
  EN FS: They are singing on the phone.
  ua FS: Вони співають по телефону.
  EN TP: arguing on the phone
  ua TP: сваряться по телефону
  EN FP: arguing in the kitchen
  ua FP: сваряться на кухні
1757 | blossom (noun): a flower on a tree, like cherry blossom | loc: цвіт
  EN TS: Music under the blossoms? Romantic.
  ua TS: Музика під цвітом? Романтика.
  EN FS: Dancing under the blossoms? Romantic.
  ua FS: Танці під цвітом? Романтика.
  EN TP: pink cherry blossoms
  ua TP: рожевий вишневий цвіт
  EN FP: cherry blossom tea
  ua FP: чай із вишневого цвіту
1762 | whale (noun): a huge sea animal that breathes air | loc: кит
  EN TS: A man is falling into a whale!
  ua TS: Чоловік падає в пащу кита!
  EN FS: A man is falling into a boat!
  ua FS: Чоловік падає в човен!
  EN TP: the mouth of a whale
  ua TP: паща кита
  EN FP: a whale in an aquarium
  ua FP: кит в акваріумі
1765 | greedy (adjective): wanting far more money than you need | loc: жадібний
  EN TS: So greedy! Hands off the gold!
  ua TS: Який жадібний! Руки геть від золота!
  EN FS: So greedy! Hands off the cake!
  ua FS: Який жадібний! Руки геть від торта!
  EN TP: a greedy man with coins
  ua TP: жадібний чоловік із монетами
  EN FP: a greedy dog with food
  ua FP: жадібний пес із їжею
1766 | blackberry (noun): a dark fruit made of many little parts | loc: ожина
  EN TS: Black and red blackberries.
  ua TS: Чорна й червона ожина.
  EN FS: Black and green blackberries.
  ua FS: Чорна й зелена ожина.
  EN TP: ripe blackberries on a branch
  ua TP: стигла ожина на гілці
  EN FP: blackberries in a pie
  ua FP: ожина в пирозі
1777 | banjo (noun): a round-bodied string instrument | loc: банджо
  EN TS: This dude is playing the banjo.
  ua TS: Цей чувак грає на банджо.
  EN FS: This dude is playing the drums.
  ua FS: Цей чувак грає на барабанах.
  EN TP: playing a banjo
  ua TP: грає на банджо
  EN FP: tuning a banjo
  ua FP: налаштовує банджо
1779 | chain (noun): a row of metal rings joined together | loc: ланцюг
  EN TS: His chain is out of control!
  ua TS: Його ланцюг вийшов з-під контролю!
  EN FS: His rope is out of control!
  ua FS: Його мотузка вийшла з-під контролю!
  EN TP: a chain whipping around him
  ua TP: ланцюг хльоскає навколо нього
  EN FP: a chain around his neck
  ua FP: ланцюг на його шиї
1780 | bike (noun): a vehicle with two wheels that you pedal | loc: велик
  EN TS: A dog is chasing his bike!
  ua TS: Собака женеться за його великом!
  EN FS: A cat is chasing his bike!
  ua FS: Кіт женеться за його великом!
  EN TP: a bike ride downhill
  ua TP: їде на велику з гори
  EN FP: a bike ride uphill
  ua FP: їде на велику в гору
1781 | halloween (noun): the autumn night of scary costumes and pumpkins | loc: Гелловін
  EN TS: Halloween every day in this house.
  ua TS: У цьому домі щодня Гелловін.
  EN FS: Halloween every day in this castle.
  ua FS: У цьому замку щодня Гелловін.
  EN TP: a Halloween haunted house
  ua TP: будинок із привидами на Гелловін
  EN FP: a Halloween party at school
  ua FP: шкільна вечірка на Гелловін
1783 | child (noun): a young person, a boy or a girl | loc: дитина
  EN TS: Four children, one lap, a hug for each child.
  ua TS: Четверо дітей, одні коліна, обійми для кожної дитини.
  EN FS: Four children, one lap, a gift for each child.
  ua FS: Четверо дітей, одні коліна, подарунок для кожної дитини.
  EN TP: a man hugging each child
  ua TP: чоловік обіймає кожну дитину
  EN FP: a man teaching each child
  ua FP: чоловік навчає кожну дитину
1785 | beautiful (adjective): delighting the senses, very nice to look at | loc: красивий
  EN TS: This is a beautiful drawing.
  ua TS: Це красивий малюнок.
  EN FS: This is a beautiful photo.
  ua FS: Це красиве фото.
  EN TP: a beautiful portrait
  ua TP: красивий портрет
  EN FP: a beautiful sunset
  ua FP: красивий захід сонця
1786 | meteor (noun): a space rock that burns as it falls | loc: метеор
  EN TS: Meteors are falling like rain.
  ua TS: Метеори падають, як дощ.
  EN FS: Leaves are falling like rain.
  ua FS: Листя падає, як дощ.
  EN TP: meteors raining down
  ua TP: дощ із метеорів
  EN FP: a meteor in a museum
  ua FP: метеор у музеї
1787 | streetlight (noun): a tall lamp that lights a street at night | loc: вуличний ліхтар
  EN TS: Red scarf under a streetlight. Stylish.
  ua TS: Червоний шарф під вуличним ліхтарем. Стильно.
  EN FS: Blue scarf under a streetlight. Stylish.
  ua FS: Синій шарф під вуличним ліхтарем. Стильно.
  EN TP: a glowing streetlight
  ua TP: сяйливий вуличний ліхтар
  EN FP: a broken streetlight
  ua FP: розбитий вуличний ліхтар
1788 | monster (noun): a frightening creature that is not real | loc: монстр
  EN TS: A sea monster with passengers!
  ua TS: Морський монстр із пасажирами!
  EN FS: A sea turtle with passengers!
  ua FS: Морська черепаха з пасажирами!
  EN TP: a sea monster rising
  ua TP: морський монстр здіймається
  EN FP: a monster under the bed
  ua FP: монстр під ліжком
1792 | build (verb): to make something by combining parts | loc: будувати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They are building a tower.
  ua TS: Вони будують вежу.
  EN FS: They are building a ship.
  ua FS: Вони будують корабель.
  EN TP: to build a huge tower
  ua TP: будувати величезну вежу
  EN FP: to build a small house
  ua FP: будувати маленький будинок
1794 | feather (noun): one of the light soft things covering a bird | loc: перо
  EN TS: So many peacock feathers!
  ua TS: Скільки павичевих пер!
  EN FS: So many swan feathers!
  ua FS: Скільки лебединих пер!
  EN TP: shimmering peacock feathers
  ua TP: мерехтливі павичеві пера
  EN FP: a feather in a pillow
  ua FP: перо в подушці
1799 | cello (noun): a large string instrument played sitting down | loc: віолончель
  EN TS: The cello is the largest one.
  ua TS: Віолончель тут найбільша.
  EN FS: The violin is the largest one.
  ua FS: Скрипка тут найбільша.
  EN TP: a large dark cello
  ua TP: велика темна віолончель
  EN FP: a small dark cello
  ua FP: маленька темна віолончель
1800 | hide (verb): to keep yourself or something from being seen | loc: ховатися | checker: word_missing? | translator note: TS uses transitive ховати (hide a smile); reflexive ховатися does not fit
  EN TS: They are hiding a smile.
  ua TS: Вони ховають усмішку.
  EN FS: They are hiding a phone.
  ua FS: Вони ховають телефон.
  EN TP: hiding behind a book
  ua TP: ховається за книжкою
  EN FP: hiding under a table
  ua FP: ховається під столом
1802 | note (noun): a sign for a single sound in written music | loc: нота
  EN TS: Notes are pouring out of the guitar!
  ua TS: З гітари ллються ноти!
  EN FS: Coins are pouring out of the guitar!
  ua FS: З гітари ллються монети!
  EN TP: a waterfall of notes
  ua TP: водоспад нот
  EN FP: a stack of notes
  ua FP: стос нот
1803 | throw (verb): to send something through the air | loc: кидати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is going to throw the ball.
  ua TS: Він зараз кине м'яч.
  EN FS: He is going to kick the ball.
  ua FS: Він зараз вдарить м'яч ногою.
  EN TP: about to throw the ball
  ua TP: ось-ось кине м'яч
  EN FP: to throw a party
  ua FP: влаштувати вечірку
1806 | bun (noun): hair twisted into a round knot on the head | loc: пучок
  EN TS: Two buns? She is so trendy.
  ua TS: Два пучки? Вона така трендова.
  EN FS: Two bows? She is so trendy.
  ua FS: Два банти? Вона така трендова.
  EN TP: hair in two round buns
  ua TP: волосся у два круглі пучки
  EN FP: two buns on a plate
  ua FP: дві булочки на тарілці
1807 | skull (noun): the bones that form the head | loc: череп
  EN TS: Skulls are floating around her.
  ua TS: Навколо неї літають черепи.
  EN FS: Hearts are floating around her.
  ua FS: Навколо неї літають серця.
  EN TP: skulls in pink flames
  ua TP: черепи в рожевому полум'ї
  EN FP: skulls on a pirate flag
  ua FP: черепи на піратському прапорі
1808 | headset (noun): a device worn on the head over eyes or ears | loc: гарнітура
  EN TS: His headset is huge, bro.
  ua TS: У нього величезна гарнітура, бро.
  EN FS: His hat is huge, bro.
  ua FS: У нього величезна шапка, бро.
  EN TP: a chunky headset
  ua TP: масивна гарнітура
  EN FP: a headset on a pilot
  ua FP: гарнітура на пілоті
1811 | raincoat (noun): a waterproof coat you wear in the rain | loc: дощовик
  EN TS: The raincoat is doing its job.
  ua TS: Дощовик виконує свою роботу.
  EN FS: The umbrella is doing its job.
  ua FS: Парасолька виконує свою роботу.
  EN TP: a long yellow raincoat
  ua TP: довгий жовтий дощовик
  EN FP: a raincoat on a hook
  ua FP: дощовик на гачку
1812 | look (verb): to turn your eyes toward something | loc: дивитися
  EN TS: The cat is looking out too.
  ua TS: Кіт теж дивиться у вікно.
  EN FS: The dog is looking out too.
  ua FS: Пес теж дивиться у вікно.
  EN TP: looking out of the window
  ua TP: дивиться у вікно
  EN FP: to look after a cat
  ua FP: доглядати кота
1823 | lonely (adjective): sad because you are all alone | loc: самотній
  EN TS: She feels lonely tonight.
  ua TS: Цього вечора вона почувається самотньою.
  EN FS: She feels lonely this morning.
  ua FS: Цього ранку вона почувається самотньою.
  EN TP: lonely on a balcony
  ua TP: самотня на балконі
  EN FP: lonely in a crowd
  ua FP: самотня в натовпі
1827 | math (noun): the study of numbers and shapes | loc: математика
  EN TS: The cat hates math.
  ua TS: Кіт ненавидить математику.
  EN FS: The dog hates math.
  ua FS: Пес ненавидить математику.
  EN TP: walls covered in math
  ua TP: стіни, вкриті математикою
  EN FP: math books on the floor
  ua FP: книжки з математики на підлозі
1831 | light bulb (noun): a glass ball in a lamp that glows when switched on | loc: лампочка
  EN TS: A cabin is in the light bulb.
  ua TS: Хатинка всередині лампочки.
  EN FS: A cabin is in the teacup.
  ua FS: Хатинка всередині чашки.
  EN TP: a snowy light bulb
  ua TP: засніжена лампочка
  EN FP: a broken light bulb
  ua FP: розбита лампочка
1832 | take a photo (phrase): to make a picture with a camera or phone | loc: зробити фото
  EN TS: She is taking a photo. Cool!
  ua TS: Вона робить фото. Круто!
  EN FS: She is making a call. Cool!
  ua FS: Вона дзвонить. Круто!
  EN TP: taking a photo at night
  ua TP: робить фото вночі
  EN FP: taking a photo indoors
  ua FP: робить фото в приміщенні
1833 | lean (verb): to rest your body sideways on something | loc: притулятися
  EN TS: He is leaning on his guitar.
  ua TS: Він притуляється до гітари.
  EN FS: He is leaning on his piano.
  ua FS: Він притуляється до піаніно.
  EN TP: leaning on a guitar
  ua TP: притуляється до гітари
  EN FP: leaning on a tree
  ua FP: притуляється до дерева
1834 | teach (verb): to help someone learn a skill or subject | loc: навчати
  EN TS: A god is teaching a warrior.
  ua TS: Бог навчає воїна.
  EN FS: A god is teaching a child.
  ua FS: Бог навчає дитину.
  EN TP: teaching a warrior
  ua TP: навчає воїна
  EN FP: teaching a crowd
  ua FP: навчає натовп
1840 | machine (noun): a thing with moving metal parts built to work | loc: машина
  EN TS: A giant machine made of gears!
  ua TS: Величезна машина з шестерень!
  EN FS: A giant machine made of wood!
  ua FS: Величезна машина з дерева!
  EN TP: a machine of rusty gears
  ua TP: машина з іржавих шестерень
  EN FP: a coffee machine
  ua FP: кавова машина
1843 | neighborhood (noun): the streets and houses around your home | loc: район
  EN TS: A snowy neighborhood at night.
  ua TS: Засніжений район уночі.
  EN FS: A snowy neighborhood at noon.
  ua FS: Засніжений район опівдні.
  EN TP: a snowy neighborhood
  ua TP: засніжений район
  EN FP: a neighborhood party
  ua FP: вечірка в районі
1846 | crane (noun): a large white bird with a long neck and legs | loc: журавель
  EN TS: A crane is flying by the sun.
  ua TS: Журавель летить біля сонця.
  EN FS: A crane is flying by the moon.
  ua FS: Журавель летить біля місяця.
  EN TP: a flying white crane
  ua TP: білий журавель у польоті
  EN FP: a crane lifting boxes
  ua FP: кран піднімає ящики
1847 | christmas tree (noun): a pine decorated with lights for the holidays | loc: ялинка
  EN TS: I count three Christmas trees.
  ua TS: Я рахую три ялинки.
  EN FS: I count five Christmas trees.
  ua FS: Я рахую п'ять ялинок.
  EN TP: three little Christmas trees
  ua TP: три маленькі ялинки
  EN FP: a Christmas tree with gifts
  ua FP: ялинка з подарунками
1849 | magic (noun): power that makes impossible things happen | loc: магія
  EN TS: Her magic is glowing!
  ua TS: Її магія сяє!
  EN FS: Her hair is glowing!
  ua FS: Її волосся сяє!
  EN TP: glowing blue magic
  ua TP: сяйлива синя магія
  EN FP: a magic card trick
  ua FP: магічний фокус із картами
1851 | valley (noun): the low land between mountains | loc: долина
  EN TS: Mist swallows the valleys.
  ua TS: Туман поглинає долини.
  EN FS: Snow swallows the valleys.
  ua FS: Сніг поглинає долини.
  EN TP: mist in the valley
  ua TP: туман у долині
  EN FP: a valley full of houses
  ua FP: долина, повна будинків
1853 | dragon (noun): a huge scaly beast from old stories | loc: дракон
  EN TS: The dragon is breathing fire.
  ua TS: Дракон дихає вогнем.
  EN FS: The dragon is breathing ice.
  ua FS: Дракон дихає льодом.
  EN TP: a small white dragon
  ua TP: маленький білий дракон
  EN FP: a big green dragon
  ua FP: великий зелений дракон
1854 | string (noun): one of the thin wires you pluck on a guitar | loc: струна
  EN TS: The guitar has white strings.
  ua TS: У гітари білі струни.
  EN FS: The guitar has black strings.
  ua FS: У гітари чорні струни.
  EN TP: white strings on a guitar
  ua TP: білі струни на гітарі
  EN FP: white strings on a kite
  ua FP: білі нитки повітряного змія
1855 | tail (noun): the part at the back end of an animal's body | loc: хвіст
  EN TS: The peacock has a huge tail!
  ua TS: У павича величезний хвіст!
  EN FS: The peacock has a short tail!
  ua FS: У павича короткий хвіст!
  EN TP: a peacock showing its tail
  ua TP: павич розпускає хвіст
  EN FP: a peacock hiding its tail
  ua FP: павич ховає хвіст
1856 | tiny (adjective): very, very small | loc: крихітний
  EN TS: The figure is tiny. The sky is big.
  ua TS: Фігурка крихітна. Небо велике.
  EN FS: The figure is huge. The sky is big.
  ua FS: Фігурка величезна. Небо велике.
  EN TP: a tiny figure on grass
  ua TP: крихітна фігурка на траві
  EN FP: a tiny shelf figure
  ua FP: крихітна фігурка на полиці
1857 | easter (noun): the spring holiday when Christians remember Jesus | loc: Великдень
  EN TS: This is an Easter poster.
  ua TS: Це плакат до Великодня.
  EN FS: This is a Christmas poster.
  ua FS: Це плакат до Різдва.
  EN TP: an Easter poster
  ua TP: плакат до Великодня
  EN FP: an Easter egg hunt
  ua FP: пошук яєць на Великдень
1858 | scarf (noun): a long piece of cloth you wear around your neck | loc: шарф
  EN TS: The child has a long scarf and a big balloon.
  ua TS: У дитини довгий шарф і велика повітряна кулька.
  EN FS: The child has a long sword and a big balloon.
  ua FS: У дитини довгий меч і велика повітряна кулька.
  EN TP: a long striped scarf
  ua TP: довгий смугастий шарф
  EN FP: a scarf in a drawer
  ua FP: шарф у шухляді
1860 | stack (noun): a neat pile of things placed on top of each other | loc: стос
  EN TS: His head is a stack of books.
  ua TS: Його голова — це стос книжок.
  EN FS: His head is a stack of plates.
  ua FS: Його голова — це стос тарілок.
  EN TP: a stack of books
  ua TP: стос книжок
  EN FP: a stack of boxes
  ua FP: стос коробок
1861 | antique (adjective): old, valuable and from an earlier time | loc: антикварний
  EN TS: This antique seat has a swan.
  ua TS: На цьому антикварному кріслі є лебідь.
  EN FS: This antique seat has a lion.
  ua FS: На цьому антикварному кріслі є лев.
  EN TP: an antique carved seat
  ua TP: антикварне різьблене крісло
  EN FP: an antique carved clock
  ua FP: антикварний різьблений годинник
1862 | vase (noun): a container you put flowers in | loc: ваза
  EN TS: The vase has pink roses.
  ua TS: У вазі рожеві троянди.
  EN FS: The vase has white roses.
  ua FS: У вазі білі троянди.
  EN TP: a grey classical vase
  ua TP: сіра класична ваза
  EN FP: a broken classical vase
  ua FP: розбита класична ваза
1863 | hang (verb): to attach something high up so it drops down | loc: висіти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The swing hangs from the moon!
  ua TS: Гойдалка висить на місяці!
  EN FS: The swing hangs from a tree!
  ua FS: Гойдалка висить на дереві!
  EN TP: hanging from the moon
  ua TP: висить на місяці
  EN FP: hanging from a tree
  ua FP: висить на дереві
1865 | fin (noun): the thin part a fish uses to swim | loc: плавець | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Those blue fins? Pure fashion.
  ua TS: Ці сині плавці? Чиста мода.
  EN FS: Those red fins? Pure fashion.
  ua FS: Ці червоні плавці? Чиста мода.
  EN TP: big flowing fins
  ua TP: великі розвівані плавці
  EN FP: fins on a diver
  ua FP: ласти на дайверові
1866 | spy (noun): a person who secretly finds out information | loc: шпигун
  EN TS: Sunglasses and a gun: a classic spy.
  ua TS: Сонцезахисні окуляри й пістолет: класичний шпигун.
  EN FS: Sunglasses and a knife: a classic spy.
  ua FS: Сонцезахисні окуляри й ніж: класичний шпигун.
  EN TP: a spy with a pistol
  ua TP: шпигун із пістолетом
  EN FP: a spy with a camera
  ua FP: шпигун із фотоапаратом
1868 | justice (noun): fair treatment of people by the law | loc: справедливість
  EN TS: Justice needs a lot of heavy books.
  ua TS: Справедливості потрібно багато важких книжок.
  EN FS: Justice needs a lot of candles.
  ua FS: Справедливості потрібно багато свічок.
  EN TP: the scales of justice
  ua TP: терези справедливості
  EN FP: the sword of justice
  ua FP: меч справедливості
1870 | hair (noun): the threadlike growth covering the head | loc: волосся
  EN TS: Her hair reaches her feet!
  ua TS: Її волосся сягає ніг!
  EN FS: Her hair reaches her chin!
  ua FS: Її волосся сягає підборіддя!
  EN TP: very long dark hair
  ua TP: дуже довге темне волосся
  EN FP: a hair in the soup
  ua FP: волосина в супі
1871 | glow (verb): to shine with a soft light | loc: сяяти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Her eye is glowing white.
  ua TS: Її око сяє білим.
  EN FS: Her eye is glowing red.
  ua FS: Її око сяє червоним.
  EN TP: an eye glowing white
  ua TP: око, що сяє білим
  EN FP: a lamp glowing white
  ua FP: лампа, що сяє білим
1872 | black (adjective): having the darkest color, like night | loc: чорний
  EN TS: The black cat loves books.
  ua TS: Чорний кіт любить книжки.
  EN FS: The white cat loves books.
  ua FS: Білий кіт любить книжки.
  EN TP: a black cat on books
  ua TP: чорний кіт на книжках
  EN FP: a black cat outside
  ua FP: чорний кіт надворі
1874 | pier (noun): a wooden platform built out over the water | loc: пірс
  EN TS: They are sitting on the pier.
  ua TS: Вони сидять на пірсі.
  EN FS: They are sitting on the boat.
  ua FS: Вони сидять у човні.
  EN TP: sitting on a pier
  ua TP: сидять на пірсі
  EN FP: sitting on a bridge
  ua FP: сидять на мосту
1876 | fishbowl (noun): a round glass bowl where pet fish live | loc: круглий акваріум
  EN TS: Cheap helmet: a fishbowl.
  ua TS: Дешевий шолом: круглий акваріум.
  EN FS: Cheap helmet: a bucket.
  ua FS: Дешевий шолом: відро.
  EN TP: a fishbowl on her head
  ua TP: круглий акваріум на голові
  EN FP: a fishbowl on the table
  ua FP: круглий акваріум на столі
1878 | invisible (adjective): impossible to see with your eyes | loc: невидимий
  EN TS: His head is invisible!
  ua TS: Його голова невидима!
  EN FS: His suit is invisible!
  ua FS: Його костюм невидимий!
  EN TP: an invisible head
  ua TP: невидима голова
  EN FP: an invisible hand
  ua FP: невидима рука
1879 | dome (noun): a round roof shaped like half a ball | loc: купол
  EN TS: The dome shines like gold.
  ua TS: Купол сяє, як золото.
  EN FS: The dome shines like silver.
  ua FS: Купол сяє, як срібло.
  EN TP: a golden dome
  ua TP: золотий купол
  EN FP: a glass dome
  ua FP: скляний купол
1880 | invention (noun): a new machine that someone has created | loc: винахід
  EN TS: Best invention ever: a flying ship.
  ua TS: Найкращий винахід в історії: летючий корабель.
  EN FS: Best invention ever: a flying car.
  ua FS: Найкращий винахід в історії: летюча машина.
  EN TP: a flying invention
  ua TP: летючий винахід
  EN FP: an invention on wheels
  ua FP: винахід на колесах
1881 | meditate (verb): to sit quietly and calm your mind | loc: медитувати
  EN TS: She is meditating calmly.
  ua TS: Вона спокійно медитує.
  EN FS: She is sleeping calmly.
  ua FS: Вона спокійно спить.
  EN TP: meditating in lotus position
  ua TP: медитує в позі лотоса
  EN FP: meditating before an exam
  ua FP: медитує перед іспитом
1883 | hen (noun): a female chicken | loc: курка
  EN TS: The hens are eating outside.
  ua TS: Кури їдять надворі.
  EN FS: The hens are eating inside.
  ua FS: Кури їдять у хаті.
  EN TP: hens in a farmyard
  ua TP: кури на подвір'ї
  EN FP: hens in a kitchen
  ua FP: кури на кухні
1884 | reflection (noun): the mirror image seen in water or glass | loc: відображення
  EN TS: The reflection is upside down.
  ua TS: Відображення перевернуте.
  EN FS: The reflection is very blurry.
  ua FS: Відображення дуже розмите.
  EN TP: a reflection in still water
  ua TP: відображення в тихій воді
  EN FP: a reflection in a mirror
  ua FP: відображення в дзеркалі
1885 | rich (adjective): having a lot of money and material wealth | loc: багатий
  EN TS: The rich man is on top.
  ua TS: Багатий чоловік нагорі.
  EN FS: The rich man is at the bottom.
  ua FS: Багатий чоловік унизу.
  EN TP: a rich man on top
  ua TP: багатий чоловік нагорі
  EN FP: a rich man in prison
  ua FP: багатий чоловік у в'язниці
1886 | consumer (noun): a person who buys and uses goods | loc: споживач
  EN TS: The consumer's plate is empty.
  ua TS: Тарілка споживача порожня.
  EN FS: The consumer's plate is full.
  ua FS: Тарілка споживача повна.
  EN TP: a hungry consumer
  ua TP: голодний споживач
  EN FP: a consumer in a shop
  ua FP: споживач у магазині
1887 | push (verb): to move something with force | loc: штовхати
  EN TS: He is pushing a heavy cart.
  ua TS: Він штовхає важкий візок.
  EN FS: He is pushing a heavy car.
  ua FS: Він штовхає важку машину.
  EN TP: pushing an overloaded cart
  ua TP: штовхає перевантажений візок
  EN FP: pushing a baby buggy
  ua FP: штовхає дитячий візочок
1889 | move (verb): to change location, to travel or proceed | loc: рухатися | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is moving like lightning!
  ua TS: Вона рухається, як блискавка!
  EN FS: She is sitting like a statue!
  ua FS: Вона сидить, як статуя!
  EN TP: moving to the music
  ua TP: рухається під музику
  EN FP: moving to a new flat
  ua FP: переїжджає в нову квартиру
1892 | old (adjective): having lived for a long time | loc: старий
  EN TS: The old man has a thin stick.
  ua TS: У старого тонка палиця.
  EN FS: The old man has an umbrella.
  ua FS: У старого парасолька.
  EN TP: the old man's stick
  ua TP: палиця старого
  EN FP: the old man's umbrella
  ua FP: парасолька старого
1894 | hedgehog (noun): a small animal covered in sharp spines | loc: їжак
  EN TS: Sleep well, little hedgehogs.
  ua TS: Солодких снів, маленькі їжаки.
  EN FS: Sleep well, little rabbits.
  ua FS: Солодких снів, маленькі кролики.
  EN TP: a hedgehog family in bed
  ua TP: родина їжаків у ліжку
  EN FP: a hedgehog in a garden
  ua FP: їжак у саду
1897 | pumpkin (noun): a big round orange vegetable with thick skin | loc: гарбуз
  EN TS: The crow owns these pumpkins.
  ua TS: Ці гарбузи належать вороні.
  EN FS: The cat owns these pumpkins.
  ua FS: Ці гарбузи належать коту.
  EN TP: three stacked pumpkins
  ua TP: три гарбузи один на одному
  EN FP: a pumpkin pie
  ua FP: гарбузовий пиріг
1899 | ruins (noun): the broken remains of old buildings | loc: руїни
  EN TS: Two giants sit near the ruins.
  ua TS: Двоє велетнів сидять біля руїн.
  EN FS: Two lions sit near the ruins.
  ua FS: Двоє левів сидять біля руїн.
  EN TP: ruins of old temples
  ua TP: руїни старих храмів
  EN FP: ruins of a castle
  ua FP: руїни замку
1905 | curious (adjective): wanting to know what is going on | loc: допитливий
  EN TS: These cats are so curious!
  ua TS: Ці коти такі допитливі!
  EN FS: These dogs are so curious!
  ua FS: Ці пси такі допитливі!
  EN TP: three curious cats
  ua TP: три допитливі коти
  EN FP: three sleepy cats
  ua FP: три сонні коти
1906 | blue (adjective): the color between green and violet | loc: синій
  EN TS: Her hair is blue.
  ua TS: Її волосся синє.
  EN FS: Her hair is red.
  ua FS: Її волосся червоне.
  EN TP: long blue hair
  ua TP: довге синє волосся
  EN FP: a blue summer dress
  ua FP: синя літня сукня
1908 | heron (noun): a tall water bird with long legs and beak | loc: чапля
  EN TS: Bro, the heron is chilling.
  ua TS: Бро, чапля чилить.
  EN FS: Bro, the swan is chilling.
  ua FS: Бро, лебідь чилить.
  EN TP: a heron on a branch
  ua TP: чапля на гілці
  EN FP: a heron in the water
  ua FP: чапля у воді
1909 | blade (noun): the flat cutting part of a knife | loc: лезо
  EN TS: Her blade is shining.
  ua TS: Її лезо сяє.
  EN FS: Her blade is rusty.
  ua FS: Її лезо іржаве.
  EN TP: a long steel blade
  ua TP: довге сталеве лезо
  EN FP: a short broken blade
  ua FP: коротке зламане лезо
1910 | petal (noun): one of the soft colored parts of a flower | loc: пелюстка
  EN TS: She has so many pink petals.
  ua TS: У неї стільки рожевих пелюсток.
  EN FS: She has so many pink feathers.
  ua FS: У неї стільки рожевих пір'їн.
  EN TP: large pink petals
  ua TP: великі рожеві пелюстки
  EN FP: petals on the floor
  ua FP: пелюстки на підлозі
1911 | princess (noun): the daughter of a king or queen | loc: принцеса
  EN TS: This princess has great style.
  ua TS: У цієї принцеси чудовий стиль.
  EN FS: This prince has great style.
  ua FS: У цього принца чудовий стиль.
  EN TP: a princess in blue
  ua TP: принцеса в блакитному
  EN FP: a princess in red
  ua FP: принцеса в червоному
1912 | tattoo (noun): a permanent picture inked into the skin | loc: татуювання
  EN TS: Her tattoos are blue.
  ua TS: Її татуювання сині.
  EN FS: Her tattoos are red.
  ua FS: Її татуювання червоні.
  EN TP: swirling blue face tattoos
  ua TP: сині татуювання-завитки на обличчі
  EN FP: a tattoo on her hand
  ua FP: татуювання на її руці
1914 | piano (noun): a large instrument you play by pressing keys | loc: піаніно
  EN TS: The piano is open. Hungry?
  ua TS: Піаніно відкрите. Зголодніло?
  EN FS: The door is open. Hungry?
  ua FS: Двері відчинені. Зголодніли?
  EN TP: an open grand piano
  ua TP: відкрите концертне піаніно
  EN FP: a piano lesson
  ua FP: урок піаніно
1915 | bass (noun): the biggest string instrument, deepest sound | loc: контрабас
  EN TS: The bass has four strings.
  ua TS: У контрабаса чотири струни.
  EN FS: The bass has six strings.
  ua FS: У контрабаса шість струн.
  EN TP: a bass with four strings
  ua TP: контрабас із чотирма струнами
  EN FP: a bass with six strings
  ua FP: контрабас із шістьма струнами
1916 | ufo (noun): a flying object believed to come from space | loc: НЛО
  EN TS: There are UFOs in the sky.
  ua TS: У небі НЛО.
  EN FS: There are birds in the sky.
  ua FS: У небі птахи.
  EN TP: UFOs in the sky
  ua TP: НЛО в небі
  EN FP: a UFO landing
  ua FP: НЛО приземляється
1917 | speed (noun): how fast something moves, distance per time | loc: швидкість
  EN TS: A helmet designed for speed.
  ua TS: Шолом, створений для швидкості.
  EN FS: A helmet designed for cycling.
  ua FS: Шолом, створений для велоспорту.
  EN TP: a helmet built for speed
  ua TP: шолом для швидкості
  EN FP: speed on a bicycle
  ua FP: швидкість на велосипеді
1919 | narrow (adjective): not wide, small from side to side | loc: вузький
  EN TS: The lane is very narrow.
  ua TS: Провулок дуже вузький.
  EN FS: The lane is very wide.
  ua FS: Провулок дуже широкий.
  EN TP: a narrow cobblestone lane
  ua TP: вузький бруківчастий провулок
  EN FP: a narrow escape
  ua FP: вузьке місце
1920 | cyborg (noun): a being that is part human, part machine | loc: кіборг
  EN TS: The cyborg has a glowing head.
  ua TS: У кіборга світиться голова.
  EN FS: The cyborg has a glowing tail.
  ua FS: У кіборга світиться хвіст.
  EN TP: a neon city cyborg
  ua TP: кіборг неонового міста
  EN FP: a cyborg in a forest
  ua FP: кіборг у лісі
1921 | shocked (adjective): very surprised and upset by something bad | loc: шокований
  EN TS: A shocked face by the water.
  ua TS: Шоковане обличчя біля води.
  EN FS: A shocked face in the forest.
  ua FS: Шоковане обличчя в лісі.
  EN TP: a shocked, screaming face
  ua TP: шоковане обличчя, що кричить
  EN FP: shocked by the phone bill
  ua FP: шокований рахунком за телефон
1922 | study (verb): to learn about a subject by reading | loc: вчитися | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Studying gives her a headache.
  ua TS: Вона вчиться, і від цього болить голова.
  EN FS: Cooking gives her a headache.
  ua FS: Вона готує, і від цього болить голова.
  EN TP: studying a huge book
  ua TP: вчиться з величезної книжки
  EN FP: studying in the garden
  ua FP: вчиться в саду
1923 | bookshelf (noun): shelves where books stand side by side | loc: книжкова полиця
  EN TS: The bookshelves are packed!
  ua TS: Книжкові полиці забиті!
  EN FS: The bookshelves are empty!
  ua FS: Книжкові полиці порожні!
  EN TP: tall bookshelves full of books
  ua TP: високі книжкові полиці з книжками
  EN FP: an empty bookshelf
  ua FP: порожня книжкова полиця
1924 | vivid (adjective): very bright and intense in colour | loc: яскравий
  EN TS: So many vivid colours!
  ua TS: Скільки яскравих кольорів!
  EN FS: So many dull colours!
  ua FS: Скільки тьмяних кольорів!
  EN TP: vivid swirls of colour
  ua TP: яскраві кольорові завитки
  EN FP: a vivid dream
  ua FP: яскравий сон
1926 | teeth (noun): the hard white things in your mouth for biting | loc: зуби
  EN TS: The skull has all its teeth!
  ua TS: У черепа всі зуби на місці!
  EN FS: The skull has no teeth!
  ua FS: У черепа немає зубів!
  EN TP: a skull's grinning teeth
  ua TP: вишкірені зуби черепа
  EN FP: a dog's sharp teeth
  ua FP: гострі зуби собаки
1927 | roots (noun): the parts of a plant that grow underground | loc: коріння
  EN TS: Golden roots? Not a cheap tree.
  ua TS: Золоте коріння? Недешеве дерево.
  EN FS: Golden leaves? Not a cheap tree.
  ua FS: Золоте листя? Недешеве дерево.
  EN TP: golden roots with jewels
  ua TP: золоте коріння з коштовностями
  EN FP: golden leaves with jewels
  ua FP: золоте листя з коштовностями
1928 | downtown (noun): the busy central business area of a city | loc: центр міста
  EN TS: Downtown glows red. So cool.
  ua TS: Центр міста світиться червоним. Круто.
  EN FS: Downtown glows green. So cool.
  ua FS: Центр міста світиться зеленим. Круто.
  EN TP: a neon downtown street
  ua TP: неонова вулиця в центрі міста
  EN FP: a quiet downtown morning
  ua FP: тихий ранок у центрі міста
1930 | medieval (adjective): from the age of castles and stone towns | loc: середньовічний
  EN TS: The medieval town looks cosy.
  ua TS: Середньовічне містечко виглядає затишно.
  EN FS: The modern city looks cosy.
  ua FS: Сучасне місто виглядає затишно.
  EN TP: a medieval stone town
  ua TP: середньовічне кам'яне містечко
  EN FP: a medieval market day
  ua FP: ярмарок у середньовічному місті
1931 | rainy (adjective): with a lot of water falling from the clouds | loc: дощовий
  EN TS: A rainy city street.
  ua TS: Дощова міська вулиця.
  EN FS: A sunny city street.
  ua FS: Сонячна міська вулиця.
  EN TP: a rainy street
  ua TP: дощова вулиця
  EN FP: a rainy beach
  ua FP: дощовий пляж
1932 | computer (noun): an electronic machine for work, games and the web | loc: комп'ютер
  EN TS: The computer is on a red desk.
  ua TS: Комп'ютер стоїть на червоному столі.
  EN FS: The computer is on a red sofa.
  ua FS: Комп'ютер стоїть на червоному дивані.
  EN TP: a computer on a desk
  ua TP: комп'ютер на столі
  EN FP: a computer on a lap
  ua FP: комп'ютер на колінах
1933 | spirit (noun): a magical being of nature, not fully human | loc: дух
  EN TS: She is a tree spirit.
  ua TS: Вона — дух дерева.
  EN FS: She is a water spirit.
  ua FS: Вона — дух води.
  EN TP: an old tree spirit
  ua TP: старий дух дерева
  EN FP: a spirit of the ocean
  ua FP: дух океану
1934 | surreal (adjective): strange and dream-like, against real rules | loc: сюрреалістичний
  EN TS: These shelves are surreal.
  ua TS: Ці полиці сюрреалістичні.
  EN FS: These shelves are ordinary.
  ua FS: Ці полиці звичайні.
  EN TP: surreal bending bookshelves
  ua TP: сюрреалістичні вигнуті полиці
  EN FP: a surreal melting clock
  ua FP: сюрреалістичний годинник, що тане
1935 | new york (noun): the biggest city in the United States | loc: Нью-Йорк
  EN TS: It is sunset in New York.
  ua TS: У Нью-Йорку захід сонця.
  EN FS: It is night in New York.
  ua FS: У Нью-Йорку ніч.
  EN TP: New York at sunset
  ua TP: Нью-Йорк на заході сонця
  EN FP: New York at night
  ua FP: Нью-Йорк уночі
1936 | flower crown (noun): a ring of blossoms you wear on your head | loc: вінок із квітів
  EN TS: Her flower crown is huge!
  ua TS: Її вінок із квітів величезний!
  EN FS: Her feather crown is huge!
  ua FS: Її вінок із пір'я величезний!
  EN TP: wearing a flower crown
  ua TP: у вінку з квітів
  EN FP: making a flower crown
  ua FP: плете вінок із квітів
1937 | hacker (noun): a person who breaks into computers and code | loc: хакер
  EN TS: The hacker is wearing a hood.
  ua TS: Хакер у капюшоні.
  EN FS: The hacker is wearing a cap.
  ua FS: Хакер у кепці.
  EN TP: a hooded hacker
  ua TP: хакер у капюшоні
  EN FP: a hacker in the park
  ua FP: хакер у парку
1938 | coast (noun): the land right along the edge of the sea | loc: узбережжя
  EN TS: A lone whale off the coast.
  ua TS: Самотній кит біля узбережжя.
  EN FS: A lone shark off the coast.
  ua FS: Самотня акула біля узбережжя.
  EN TP: a sandy coast from above
  ua TP: піщане узбережжя згори
  EN FP: a rocky coast with cliffs
  ua FP: скелясте узбережжя з кручами
1940 | dandelion (noun): a wild yellow flower that turns into a puffball | loc: кульбаба
  EN TS: Dandelions surround her head.
  ua TS: Кульбаби оточують її голову.
  EN FS: Roses surround her head.
  ua FS: Троянди оточують її голову.
  EN TP: white dandelion puffs
  ua TP: білі пухнасті кульбаби
  EN FP: blowing a dandelion
  ua FP: дме на кульбабу
1941 | pirate (noun): a sea robber who attacks ships | loc: пірат
  EN TS: This pirate mouse looks like Jack Sparrow.
  ua TS: Ця миша-пірат — вилитий Джек Горобець.
  EN FS: This pirate cat looks like Jack Sparrow.
  ua FS: Цей кіт-пірат — вилитий Джек Горобець.
  EN TP: a pirate mouse
  ua TP: миша-пірат
  EN FP: a pirate ship
  ua FP: піратський корабель
1943 | gnome (noun): a tiny fairy-tale creature in a pointed hat | loc: гном
  EN TS: The gnome's hat is green. Wow.
  ua TS: Шапка гнома зелена. Вау.
  EN FS: The gnome's hat is red. Wow.
  ua FS: Шапка гнома червона. Вау.
  EN TP: a gnome in green
  ua TP: гном у зеленому
  EN FP: a gnome in red
  ua FP: гном у червоному
1944 | ribs (noun): the curved bones around your chest | loc: ребра
  EN TS: Fact: you can see its ribs.
  ua TS: Факт: у нього видно ребра.
  EN FS: Fact: you can see its heart.
  ua FS: Факт: у нього видно серце.
  EN TP: a cage of ribs
  ua TP: грудна клітка з ребер
  EN FP: ribs on a grill
  ua FP: ребра на грилі
1945 | spooky (adjective): strange and frightening, like a ghost place | loc: моторошний
  EN TS: What a spooky castle!
  ua TS: Який моторошний замок!
  EN FS: What a spooky church!
  ua FS: Яка моторошна церква!
  EN TP: a spooky castle on rocks
  ua TP: моторошний замок на скелях
  EN FP: a spooky castle in snow
  ua FP: моторошний замок у снігу
1946 | cool (adjective): stylish and relaxed in a way people admire | loc: крутий
  EN TS: This cat is too cool.
  ua TS: Цей кіт надто крутий.
  EN FS: This dog is too cool.
  ua FS: Цей пес надто крутий.
  EN TP: a cool cat in sunglasses
  ua TP: крутий кіт у сонцезахисних окулярах
  EN FP: a cool summer drink
  ua FP: крутий літній напій
1947 | mane (noun): the long thick hair round a lion's neck | loc: грива
  EN TS: Just a normal rainbow mane.
  ua TS: Звичайнісінька райдужна грива.
  EN FS: Just a normal black mane.
  ua FS: Звичайнісінька чорна грива.
  EN TP: a rainbow mane
  ua TP: райдужна грива
  EN FP: a rainbow over a lion
  ua FP: веселка над левом
1948 | wavy (adjective): forming soft curves instead of lying straight | loc: хвилястий
  EN TS: Her wavy hair is everywhere!
  ua TS: Її хвилясте волосся всюди!
  EN FS: Her short hair is everywhere!
  ua FS: Її коротке волосся всюди!
  EN TP: wavy hair full of leaves
  ua TP: хвилясте волосся, повне листя
  EN FP: wavy hair full of flowers
  ua FP: хвилясте волосся, повне квітів
1949 | enchanted (adjective): under a magic spell | loc: зачарований
  EN TS: This forest is so enchanted.
  ua TS: Цей ліс такий зачарований.
  EN FS: This forest is so burnt.
  ua FS: Цей ліс такий згорілий.
  EN TP: an enchanted forest path
  ua TP: стежка в зачарованому лісі
  EN FP: an enchanted castle
  ua FP: зачарований замок
1950 | evil (adjective): deeply bad and cruel | loc: злий | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: This evil tower needs a lift.
  ua TS: Цій злій вежі потрібен ліфт.
  EN FS: This evil church needs a lift.
  ua FS: Цій злій церкві потрібен ліфт.
  EN TP: an evil fortress
  ua TP: зла фортеця
  EN FP: an evil stepmother
  ua FP: зла мачуха
1951 | armchair (noun): a big soft chair with supports for your arms | loc: крісло
  EN TS: An armchair awaits a reader.
  ua TS: Крісло чекає на читача.
  EN FS: A sofa awaits a reader.
  ua FS: Диван чекає на читача.
  EN TP: a worn leather armchair
  ua TP: потерте шкіряне крісло
  EN FP: a new plastic armchair
  ua FP: нове пластикове крісло
1952 | full moon (noun): the whole bright round disc seen in the night sky | loc: повний місяць
  EN TS: A full moon behind one tree.
  ua TS: Повний місяць за одним деревом.
  EN FS: A full moon behind two trees.
  ua FS: Повний місяць за двома деревами.
  EN TP: full moon behind a tree
  ua TP: повний місяць за деревом
  EN FP: full moon over the sea
  ua FP: повний місяць над морем
1953 | snowflake (noun): a single small ice crystal that falls as snow | loc: сніжинка
  EN TS: Snowflake crown? Queen vibes.
  ua TS: Корона зі сніжинок? Вайб королеви.
  EN FS: Flower crown? Queen vibes.
  ua FS: Корона з квітів? Вайб королеви.
  EN TP: a crown of snowflakes
  ua TP: корона зі сніжинок
  EN FP: snowflakes on a window
  ua FP: сніжинки на вікні
1955 | fairy tale (noun): a magical story world with witches and elves | loc: казка
  EN TS: OMG, it's a fairy tale house.
  ua TS: Боже, це ж будиночок із казки.
  EN FS: OMG, it's a fairy tale boat.
  ua FS: Боже, це ж човен із казки.
  EN TP: a fairy tale cottage
  ua TP: хатинка з казки
  EN FP: a fairy tale castle
  ua FP: замок із казки
1957 | cobblestones (noun): the round stones that pave old streets | loc: бруківка
  EN TS: The cobblestones are wet.
  ua TS: Бруківка мокра.
  EN FS: The cobblestones are snowy.
  ua FS: Бруківка засніжена.
  EN TP: wet cobblestones at night
  ua TP: мокра бруківка вночі
  EN FP: cobblestones on a beach
  ua FP: бруківка на пляжі
1958 | stairs (noun): a flight of steps | loc: сходи
  EN TS: Stone stairs and pink flowers.
  ua TS: Кам'яні сходи й рожеві квіти.
  EN FS: Stone stairs and red flowers.
  ua FS: Кам'яні сходи й червоні квіти.
  EN TP: stone stairs in a village
  ua TP: кам'яні сходи в селі
  EN FP: stone stairs in a castle
  ua FP: кам'яні сходи в замку
1959 | braid (noun): hair woven into one plaited strand | loc: коса
  EN TS: Her braid reaches her waist.
  ua TS: Її коса сягає талії.
  EN FS: Her braid reaches her knees.
  ua FS: Її коса сягає колін.
  EN TP: a waist-long braid
  ua TP: коса до пояса
  EN FP: a short braid
  ua FP: коротка коса
1960 | samurai (noun): a Japanese warrior who fights with a sword | loc: самурай
  EN TS: She's walking like a real samurai.
  ua TS: Вона йде, як справжній самурай.
  EN FS: She's dancing like a real samurai.
  ua FS: Вона танцює, як справжній самурай.
  EN TP: a samurai with a sword
  ua TP: самурай із мечем
  EN FP: a samurai with a bow
  ua FP: самурай із луком
1961 | bone (noun): the rigid tissue that makes up the skeleton | loc: кістка
  EN TS: These bones love a good book.
  ua TS: Ці кістки обожнюють хорошу книжку.
  EN FS: These bones love a good film.
  ua FS: Ці кістки обожнюють хороший фільм.
  EN TP: bones over an open book
  ua TP: кістки над розгорнутою книжкою
  EN FP: a dog with a bone
  ua FP: пес із кісткою
1962 | fortress (noun): a large strong building made to defend | loc: фортеця
  EN TS: This fortress looks scary!
  ua TS: Ця фортеця виглядає страшно!
  EN FS: This cottage looks scary!
  ua FS: Ця хатинка виглядає страшно!
  EN TP: a dark hilltop fortress
  ua TP: темна фортеця на пагорбі
  EN FP: a fortress in the desert
  ua FP: фортеця в пустелі
1964 | haunted (adjective): believed to have ghosts living inside | loc: населений привидами
  EN TS: The house must be haunted.
  ua TS: Цей дім точно населений привидами.
  EN FS: The school must be haunted.
  ua FS: Ця школа точно населена привидами.
  EN TP: a haunted old house
  ua TP: старий дім, населений привидами
  EN FP: a haunted old ship
  ua FP: старий корабель, населений привидами
1965 | cabin (noun): a small simple wooden house | loc: хатина
  EN TS: Cosy cabin. A bit of snow.
  ua TS: Затишна хатина. Трішки снігу.
  EN FS: Cosy cabin. A bit of sand.
  ua FS: Затишна хатина. Трішки піску.
  EN TP: a snowy wooden cabin
  ua TP: засніжена дерев'яна хатина
  EN FP: a cabin on a ship
  ua FP: каюта на кораблі
1966 | path (noun): a narrow marked way that you walk along | loc: стежка
  EN TS: The path is made of stones.
  ua TS: Стежка викладена з каменю.
  EN FS: The path is made of wood.
  ua FS: Стежка викладена з дерева.
  EN TP: a cobblestone path
  ua TP: бруківчаста стежка
  EN FP: a forest path
  ua FP: лісова стежка
1967 | cute (adjective): small and sweet in a way that makes you smile | loc: милий
  EN TS: The baby fox is so cute!
  ua TS: Лисеня таке миле!
  EN FS: The baby bear is so cute!
  ua FS: Ведмежа таке миле!
  EN TP: a cute baby fox
  ua TP: миле лисеня
  EN FP: a cute baby bird
  ua FP: миле пташеня
1968 | raven (noun): a large black bird like a big crow | loc: крук
  EN TS: I think those are ravens.
  ua TS: Здається, це круки.
  EN FS: I think those are parrots.
  ua FS: Здається, це папуги.
  EN TP: ravens flying around her
  ua TP: круки літають навколо неї
  EN FP: ravens sitting on her arm
  ua FP: круки сидять на її руці
1969 | bouquet (noun): a bunch of flowers arranged together | loc: букет
  EN TS: A bouquet from space? Romantic!
  ua TS: Букет із космосу? Романтично!
  EN FS: A bouquet from the sea? Romantic!
  ua FS: Букет із моря? Романтично!
  EN TP: gathering a bouquet
  ua TP: збирає букет
  EN FP: throwing a bouquet
  ua FP: кидає букет
1970 | hut (noun): a small simple building | loc: хатина
  EN TS: The hut has one plank door. Basic, but solid.
  ua TS: У хатини одні дощані двері. Просто, але надійно.
  EN FS: The hut has one glass door. Basic, but solid.
  ua FS: У хатини одні скляні двері. Просто, але надійно.
  EN TP: a tiny snowy hut
  ua TP: крихітна засніжена хатина
  EN FP: a tiny beach hut
  ua FP: крихітна пляжна хатина
1971 | peak (noun): the pointed top of a mountain | loc: вершина
  EN TS: Peaks over clouds. Unreal.
  ua TS: Вершини над хмарами. Нереально.
  EN FS: Peaks under clouds. Unreal.
  ua FS: Вершини під хмарами. Нереально.
  EN TP: snowy peaks above the clouds
  ua TP: засніжені вершини над хмарами
  EN FP: peaks covered in forest
  ua FP: вершини, вкриті лісом
1972 | turban (noun): a long cloth wound around the head | loc: тюрбан
  EN TS: That turban is a whole tower!
  ua TS: Цей тюрбан — ціла вежа!
  EN FS: That crown is a whole tower!
  ua FS: Ця корона — ціла вежа!
  EN TP: a tall jeweled turban
  ua TP: високий тюрбан із коштовностями
  EN FP: a turban in the desert
  ua FP: тюрбан у пустелі
1973 | goddess (noun): a female god | loc: богиня
  EN TS: This goddess looks Egyptian.
  ua TS: Ця богиня схожа на єгипетську.
  EN FS: This goddess looks Japanese.
  ua FS: Ця богиня схожа на японську.
  EN TP: a goddess with golden wings
  ua TP: богиня із золотими крилами
  EN FP: a goddess with a bow
  ua FP: богиня з луком
1974 | ballerina (noun): a girl who dances ballet on her toes | loc: балерина
  EN TS: The ballerina is on her toes.
  ua TS: Балерина стоїть на пуантах.
  EN FS: The ballerina is on her knees.
  ua FS: Балерина стоїть на колінах.
  EN TP: a ballerina in a tutu
  ua TP: балерина в пачці
  EN FP: a ballerina shoe
  ua FP: пуант балерини
1976 | skate (verb): to glide over ice wearing ice skates | loc: кататися на ковзанах
  EN TS: Four kids are skating while squirrels judge them.
  ua TS: Четверо дітей катаються на ковзанах, а білки їх оцінюють.
  EN FS: Four kids are skating while dogs judge them.
  ua FS: Четверо дітей катаються на ковзанах, а собаки їх оцінюють.
  EN TP: skating on a frozen pond
  ua TP: катаються на ковзанах на ставку
  EN FP: skating on a half-pipe
  ua FP: катаються на ковзанах на рампі
1977 | creepy (adjective): making you feel nervous and a bit scared | loc: моторошний
  EN TS: The bats make it extra creepy!
  ua TS: Через кажанів тут іще моторошніше!
  EN FS: The owls make it extra creepy!
  ua FS: Через сов тут іще моторошніше!
  EN TP: a creepy ruined house
  ua TP: моторошний зруйнований будинок
  EN FP: a creepy old doll
  ua FP: моторошна стара лялька
1979 | dye (verb): to change the colour of hair or cloth | loc: фарбувати
  EN TS: She dyed it purple. Bold!
  ua TS: Вона пофарбувалася у фіолетовий. Сміливо!
  EN FS: She dyed it green. Bold!
  ua FS: Вона пофарбувалася в зелений. Сміливо!
  EN TP: hair dyed bright purple
  ua TP: яскраво-фіолетове фарбоване волосся
  EN FP: hair dyed bright green
  ua FP: яскраво-зелене фарбоване волосся
1980 | pine (noun): a tall evergreen tree with needles | loc: сосна
  EN TS: Evergreen pines surround the hut.
  ua TS: Вічнозелені сосни оточують хатину.
  EN FS: Evergreen palms surround the hut.
  ua FS: Вічнозелені пальми оточують хатину.
  EN TP: snowy pine trees
  ua TP: засніжені сосни
  EN FP: a pine table
  ua FP: стіл із сосни
1981 | crash (verb): to hit something hard with a loud noise | loc: розбиватися
  EN TS: Waves are crashing into the lighthouse!
  ua TS: Хвилі розбиваються об маяк!
  EN FS: Waves are crashing into the harbour!
  ua FS: Хвилі розбиваються об причал!
  EN TP: waves crashing on rocks
  ua TP: хвилі розбиваються об скелі
  EN FP: crashing on a friend's sofa
  ua FP: ночує на дивані в друга
1982 | cluttered (adjective): untidily full of far too many things | loc: захаращений
  EN TS: The room is "a bit" cluttered.
  ua TS: Кімната «трохи» захаращена.
  EN FS: The room is "a bit" empty.
  ua FS: Кімната «трохи» порожня.
  EN TP: cluttered shelves
  ua TP: захаращені полиці
  EN FP: a cluttered desk
  ua FP: захаращений стіл
1983 | eyelashes (noun): the small hairs on the edge of the eyelids | loc: вії
  EN TS: Her eyelashes are very long.
  ua TS: Її вії дуже довгі.
  EN FS: Her eyelashes are very short.
  ua FS: Її вії дуже короткі.
  EN TP: long dark eyelashes
  ua TP: довгі темні вії
  EN FP: fake eyelashes in a box
  ua FP: накладні вії в коробочці
1984 | pale (adjective): very light, almost white in colour | loc: блідий
  EN TS: Her face is very pale.
  ua TS: Її обличчя дуже бліде.
  EN FS: Her face is very dark.
  ua FS: Її обличчя дуже темне.
  EN TP: a pale white face
  ua TP: бліде біле обличчя
  EN FP: a pale blue sky
  ua FP: бліде блакитне небо
1985 | bright (adjective): strong and full of color, easy to see | loc: яскравий
  EN TS: The tree is bright red!
  ua TS: Яке яскраве червоне дерево!
  EN FS: The tree is bright green!
  ua FS: Яке яскраве зелене дерево!
  EN TP: bright red leaves
  ua TP: яскраве червоне листя
  EN FP: bright red apples
  ua FP: яскраві червоні яблука
1986 | bare (adjective): not covered — no leaves, no clothes | loc: голий
  EN TS: The tree is bare. So sad.
  ua TS: Дерево голе. Так сумно.
  EN FS: The tree is green. So sad.
  ua FS: Дерево зелене. Так сумно.
  EN TP: a bare tree at night
  ua TP: голе дерево вночі
  EN FP: bare feet in the grass
  ua FP: босі ноги на траві
1987 | future (phrase): the time that will come after now | loc: майбутнє
  EN TS: This city is from the future.
  ua TS: Це місто з майбутнього.
  EN FS: This city is from the past.
  ua FS: Це місто з минулого.
  EN TP: a city of the future
  ua TP: місто майбутнього
  EN FP: a city of the past
  ua FP: місто минулого
1988 | fence (noun): a barrier that goes around an area | loc: паркан
  EN TS: The fence has sharp spikes.
  ua TS: У паркану гострі шипи.
  EN FS: The fence has no gate.
  ua FS: У паркану немає хвіртки.
  EN TP: a spiked iron fence
  ua TP: залізний паркан із шипами
  EN FP: a wooden garden fence
  ua FP: дерев'яний садовий паркан
1989 | potion (noun): a magic drink made for a special effect | loc: зілля
  EN TS: Old potions fill the shelves.
  ua TS: Полиці заставлені старим зіллям.
  EN FS: Old shoes fill the shelves.
  ua FS: Полиці заставлені старим взуттям.
  EN TP: shelves of old potions
  ua TP: полиці зі старим зіллям
  EN FP: a potion in a cauldron
  ua FP: зілля в казані
1990 | comfortable (adjective): giving a feeling of physical well-being | loc: зручний
  EN TS: A super comfortable armchair.
  ua TS: Суперзручне крісло.
  EN FS: A super comfortable sofa.
  ua FS: Суперзручний диван.
  EN TP: a comfortable golden armchair
  ua TP: зручне золоте крісло
  EN FP: a comfortable golden bed
  ua FP: зручне золоте ліжко
1991 | type (verb): to write using a keyboard | loc: друкувати
  EN TS: He is typing like a machine!
  ua TS: Він друкує, як машина!
  EN FS: He is painting like a machine!
  ua FS: Він малює, як машина!
  EN TP: typing on a keyboard
  ua TP: друкує на клавіатурі
  EN FP: typing on a phone
  ua FP: друкує на телефоні
1992 | listen (verb): to hear something on purpose | loc: слухати
  EN TS: She is listening through big green headphones.
  ua TS: Вона слухає через великі зелені навушники.
  EN FS: She is listening through big red headphones.
  ua FS: Вона слухає через великі червоні навушники.
  EN TP: listening to music
  ua TP: слухає музику
  EN FP: listening to a teacher
  ua FP: слухає вчителя
1994 | on top of (preposition): resting on the highest part of something | loc: на вершині
  EN TS: A cat is on top of the books.
  ua TS: Кіт на вершині стосу книжок.
  EN FS: A cat is on top of the hedge.
  ua FS: Кіт на вершині живоплоту.
  EN TP: on top of the books
  ua TP: на вершині стосу книжок
  EN FP: on top of the car
  ua FP: на даху машини
1995 | doorway (noun): the opening in a wall where a door is | loc: дверний проріз
  EN TS: This doorway leads to another world.
  ua TS: Цей дверний проріз веде в інший світ.
  EN FS: This doorway leads to a dark cellar.
  ua FS: Цей дверний проріз веде в темний льох.
  EN TP: a glowing arched doorway
  ua TP: сяйливий арковий дверний проріз
  EN FP: a doorway to the kitchen
  ua FP: дверний проріз на кухню
1997 | axe (noun): a tool with a heavy blade for chopping | loc: сокира
  EN TS: That battle axe is huge!
  ua TS: Ця бойова сокира величезна!
  EN FS: That battle shield is huge!
  ua FS: Цей бойовий щит величезний!
  EN TP: holding a battle axe
  ua TP: тримає бойову сокиру
  EN FP: holding a battle flag
  ua FP: тримає бойовий прапор
1998 | mansion (noun): a very large and impressive house | loc: особняк
  EN TS: Rich people live in this mansion.
  ua TS: У цьому особняку живуть багачі.
  EN FS: Rich people live in this cottage.
  ua FS: У цій хатинці живуть багачі.
  EN TP: a mansion at dusk
  ua TP: особняк у сутінках
  EN FP: a mansion on the beach
  ua FP: особняк на пляжі
1999 | fur (noun): the soft thick hair covering an animal | loc: хутро
  EN TS: Bro, that fur is so thick.
  ua TS: Бро, яке густе хутро.
  EN FS: Bro, that fur is so black.
  ua FS: Бро, яке чорне хутро.
  EN TP: thick white fur
  ua TP: густе біле хутро
  EN FP: a white fur coat
  ua FP: біла шуба
2000 | moonlight (noun): the light the moon gives at night | loc: місячне сяйво
  EN TS: Moonlight is shining on water.
  ua TS: Місячне сяйво блищить на воді.
  EN FS: Sunlight is shining on water.
  ua FS: Сонячне сяйво блищить на воді.
  EN TP: moonlight on a marsh
  ua TP: місячне сяйво на болоті
  EN FP: moonlight in a bedroom
  ua FP: місячне сяйво в спальні
2001 | beak (noun): the hard pointed mouth part of a bird | loc: дзьоб
  EN TS: The owl has a gold beak. Rich owl!
  ua TS: У сови золотий дзьоб. Багата сова!
  EN FS: The owl has a red beak. Rich owl!
  ua FS: У сови червоний дзьоб. Багата сова!
  EN TP: an owl's golden beak
  ua TP: золотий дзьоб сови
  EN FP: an owl's broken beak
  ua FP: зламаний дзьоб сови
2002 | whiskers (noun): the long stiff hairs on a cat's face | loc: вуса
  EN TS: The cat has long whiskers.
  ua TS: У кота довгі вуса.
  EN FS: The cat has short whiskers.
  ua FS: У кота короткі вуса.
  EN TP: a cat with long whiskers
  ua TP: кіт із довгими вусами
  EN FP: a man with long whiskers
  ua FP: чоловік із довгими вусами
2005 | crow (noun): a big all-black bird with a harsh call | loc: ворона
  EN TS: The crow is waiting for news.
  ua TS: Ворона чекає на новини.
  EN FS: The owl is waiting for news.
  ua FS: Сова чекає на новини.
  EN TP: a crow on a branch
  ua TP: ворона на гілці
  EN FP: a crow on a scarecrow
  ua FP: ворона на опудалі
2008 | trunk (noun): the thick wooden stem of a tree | loc: стовбур
  EN TS: The trunk is huge and twisted.
  ua TS: Стовбур величезний і скручений.
  EN FS: The trunk is thin and smooth.
  ua FS: Стовбур тонкий і гладенький.
  EN TP: a massive twisted trunk
  ua TP: масивний скручений стовбур
  EN FP: an elephant's trunk
  ua FP: хобот слона
2010 | story (noun): a tale about people and events | loc: історія
  EN TS: The story is coming alive!
  ua TS: Історія оживає!
  EN FS: The story is burning!
  ua FS: Історія горить!
  EN TP: a story coming alive
  ua TP: історія, що оживає
  EN FP: a story about a city
  ua FP: історія про місто
2011 | open (adjective): not closed, so you can go or see through | loc: відчинений
  EN TS: The door is wide open.
  ua TS: Двері навстіж відчинені.
  EN FS: The door is closed.
  ua FS: Двері зачинені.
  EN TP: an open glass door
  ua TP: відчинені скляні двері
  EN FP: an open laptop
  ua FP: відкритий ноутбук
2012 | entrance (noun): something that gives you a way to get in | loc: вхід
  EN TS: Flowers cover the entrance.
  ua TS: Квіти вкривають вхід.
  EN FS: Snow covers the entrance.
  ua FS: Сніг вкриває вхід.
  EN TP: a garden entrance with flowers
  ua TP: вхід у сад із квітами
  EN FP: a hotel entrance with flowers
  ua FP: вхід у готель із квітами
2013 | gothic (adjective): in a dark dramatic style with black clothes | loc: готичний
  EN TS: Her makeup? Totally gothic.
  ua TS: Її макіяж? Суто готичний.
  EN FS: Her makeup? Totally pink.
  ua FS: Її макіяж? Суто рожевий.
  EN TP: a gothic look
  ua TP: готичний образ
  EN FP: a gothic church
  ua FP: готична церква
2014 | dusk (noun): the fading light just before night | loc: сутінки
  EN TS: Alone at dusk. So mysterious.
  ua TS: Самотність у сутінках. Так загадково.
  EN FS: Alone at noon. So mysterious.
  ua FS: Самотність опівдні. Так загадково.
  EN TP: an old lane at dusk
  ua TP: стара вуличка в сутінках
  EN FP: dusk on an empty beach
  ua FP: сутінки на порожньому пляжі
2015 | monument (noun): a big old structure built to be remembered | loc: пам'ятник
  EN TS: Fact: the monument is stone.
  ua TS: Факт: пам'ятник кам'яний.
  EN FS: Fact: the monument is wood.
  ua FS: Факт: пам'ятник дерев'яний.
  EN TP: an old stone monument
  ua TP: старий кам'яний пам'ятник
  EN FP: a monument in a square
  ua FP: пам'ятник на площі
2016 | wand (noun): a thin stick used to cast magic spells | loc: чарівна паличка
  EN TS: Harry Potter needs this wand, bro.
  ua TS: Гаррі Поттеру треба цю чарівну паличку, бро.
  EN FS: Harry Potter needs this broom, bro.
  ua FS: Гаррі Поттеру треба цю мітлу, бро.
  EN TP: a glowing magic wand
  ua TP: сяйлива чарівна паличка
  EN FP: a broken magic wand
  ua FP: зламана чарівна паличка
2019 | locomotive (noun): the engine at the front that pulls a train | loc: локомотив
  EN TS: The locomotive runs on steam.
  ua TS: Локомотив працює на парі.
  EN FS: The locomotive runs on diesel.
  ua FS: Локомотив працює на дизелі.
  EN TP: an old steam locomotive
  ua TP: старий паровий локомотив
  EN FP: an old diesel locomotive
  ua FP: старий дизельний локомотив
2021 | constellation (noun): a group of stars that forms a pattern | loc: сузір'я
  EN TS: Constellations fill the sky.
  ua TS: Сузір'я заповнюють небо.
  EN FS: Rainbows fill the sky.
  ua FS: Веселки заповнюють небо.
  EN TP: constellations above the house
  ua TP: сузір'я над будинком
  EN FP: constellations on a map
  ua FP: сузір'я на карті
2023 | gift (noun): something you are given for free | loc: подарунок
  EN TS: Gifts were left in the snow!
  ua TS: Хтось залишив подарунки в снігу!
  EN FS: Skis were left in the snow!
  ua FS: Хтось залишив лижі в снігу!
  EN TP: gift boxes in the snow
  ua TP: коробки з подарунками в снігу
  EN FP: gift boxes under a bed
  ua FP: коробки з подарунками під ліжком
2024 | neon (adjective): glowing in bright electric colours | loc: неоновий
  EN TS: Neon signs everywhere!
  ua TS: Неонові вивіски всюди!
  EN FS: Paper signs everywhere!
  ua FS: Паперові вивіски всюди!
  EN TP: pink and green neon signs
  ua TP: рожеві й зелені неонові вивіски
  EN FP: a neon green jacket
  ua FP: неоново-зелена куртка
2025 | futuristic (adjective): looking modern, high-tech and from the future | loc: футуристичний
  EN TS: Futuristic city, year 3000?
  ua TS: Футуристичне місто, 3000 рік?
  EN FS: Futuristic village, year 3000?
  ua FS: Футуристичне село, 3000 рік?
  EN TP: futuristic towers at night
  ua TP: футуристичні вежі вночі
  EN FP: a futuristic flying car
  ua FP: футуристична летюча машина
2026 | study (noun): a room at home used for reading and working | loc: кабінет
  EN TS: What a dreamy study!
  ua TS: Оце кабінет мрії!
  EN FS: What a dreamy kitchen!
  ua FS: Оце кухня мрії!
  EN TP: a study full of flowers
  ua TP: кабінет, повний квітів
  EN FP: a study full of students
  ua FP: кабінет, повний студентів
2028 | jug (noun): a container with a handle for holding liquid | loc: глечик
  EN TS: A white jug sits among books.
  ua TS: Білий глечик стоїть серед книжок.
  EN FS: A white cat sits among books.
  ua FS: Білий кіт сидить серед книжок.
  EN TP: a jug on a bookshelf
  ua TP: глечик на книжковій полиці
  EN FP: a jug on a table
  ua FP: глечик на столі
2029 | trail (noun): a rough path through the countryside | loc: стежка
  EN TS: The trail vanishes in the fog.
  ua TS: Стежка зникає в тумані.
  EN FS: The trail vanishes in the sea.
  ua FS: Стежка зникає в морі.
  EN TP: a stony mountain trail
  ua TP: кам'яниста гірська стежка
  EN FP: a trail of footprints
  ua FP: стежка зі слідів
2031 | twig (noun): a very small thin branch of a tree | loc: гілочка
  EN TS: Her hair has twigs. Weird.
  ua TS: У неї у волоссі гілочки. Дивно.
  EN FS: Her hair has flowers. Weird.
  ua FS: У неї у волоссі квіти. Дивно.
  EN TP: twigs in her hair
  ua TP: гілочки у волоссі
  EN FP: a nest of twigs
  ua FP: гніздо з гілочок
2032 | portal (noun): a gateway that leads into another world | loc: портал
  EN TS: A portal to a golden city.
  ua TS: Портал у золоте місто.
  EN FS: A portal to a dark forest.
  ua FS: Портал у темний ліс.
  EN TP: a glowing round portal
  ua TP: сяйливий круглий портал
  EN FP: a portal under the sea
  ua FP: портал під водою
2033 | whirlpool (noun): water that spins round and pulls things down | loc: вир
  EN TS: The guitar is in a whirlpool!
  ua TS: Гітара у вирі!
  EN FS: The guitar is in a desert!
  ua FS: Гітара в пустелі!
  EN TP: a guitar in a whirlpool
  ua TP: гітара у вирі
  EN FP: a boat in a whirlpool
  ua FP: човен у вирі
2034 | poppy (noun): a wild flower with thin red petals | loc: мак
  EN TS: This poppy is red. Very red.
  ua TS: Цей мак червоний. Дуже червоний.
  EN FS: This poppy is blue. Very blue.
  ua FS: Цей мак синій. Дуже синій.
  EN TP: a red poppy bloom
  ua TP: червона квітка маку
  EN FP: a field of poppies
  ua FP: поле маків
2035 | romance (noun): a loving relationship between two people | loc: романтичні стосунки
  EN TS: This romance has a pink heart.
  ua TS: Романтичні стосунки з рожевим серцем.
  EN FS: This romance has a red heart.
  ua FS: Романтичні стосунки з червоним серцем.
  EN TP: a romance in spring
  ua TP: романтичні стосунки навесні
  EN FP: a romance novel
  ua FP: любовний роман
2036 | spear (noun): a long pole weapon with a sharp tip | loc: спис
  EN TS: Spear supply is clearly not a problem.
  ua TS: Із запасом списів явно проблем немає.
  EN FS: Sword supply is clearly not a problem.
  ua FS: Із запасом мечів явно проблем немає.
  EN TP: an army raising spears
  ua TP: армія піднімає списи
  EN FP: an army throwing spears
  ua FP: армія кидає списи
2037 | creature (noun): a living being, especially a strange one | loc: створіння
  EN TS: A creature with dark wings.
  ua TS: Створіння з темними крилами.
  EN FS: A creature with long horns.
  ua FS: Створіння з довгими рогами.
  EN TP: a dark winged creature
  ua TP: темне крилате створіння
  EN FP: a creature in the sea
  ua FP: створіння в морі
2038 | afraid (adjective): filled with fear | loc: наляканий
  EN TS: She is afraid, and the birds know it.
  ua TS: Вона налякана, і птахи це знають.
  EN FS: She is afraid, and the wolves know it.
  ua FS: Вона налякана, і вовки це знають.
  EN TP: afraid in a dark forest
  ua TP: налякана в темному лісі
  EN FP: afraid of a big dog
  ua FP: налякана великим псом
2040 | decoration (noun): a pretty thing that makes a place look festive | loc: прикраса
  EN TS: Decorations are on every roof.
  ua TS: Прикраси на кожному даху.
  EN FS: Snowmen are on every roof.
  ua FS: Сніговики на кожному даху.
  EN TP: decorations on the roofs
  ua TP: прикраси на дахах
  EN FP: decorations in a box
  ua FP: прикраси в коробці
2041 | bottle (noun): a plastic or glass container for liquids | loc: пляшка
  EN TS: A whole sunset lives in this bottle.
  ua TS: У цій пляшці живе цілий захід сонця.
  EN FS: A whole ocean lives in this bottle.
  ua FS: У цій пляшці живе цілий океан.
  EN TP: a dark glass bottle
  ua TP: пляшка з темного скла
  EN FP: a bottle of red wine
  ua FP: пляшка червоного вина
2042 | huge (adjective): unusually great in size | loc: величезний
  EN TS: That moon is huge!
  ua TS: Цей місяць величезний!
  EN FS: That sun is huge!
  ua FS: Це сонце величезне!
  EN TP: a huge full moon
  ua TP: величезний повний місяць
  EN FP: a huge old castle
  ua FP: величезний старий замок
2045 | tall (adjective): great in height, from the ground up | loc: високий
  EN TS: These stones are super tall.
  ua TS: Ці камені супервисокі.
  EN FS: These trees are super tall.
  ua FS: Ці дерева супервисокі.
  EN TP: tall standing stones
  ua TP: високі стоячі камені
  EN FP: tall trees in a field
  ua FP: високі дерева в полі
2046 | snowy (adjective): covered with snow or full of falling snow | loc: засніжений
  EN TS: A snowy night in the forest. So quiet...
  ua TS: Засніжена ніч у лісі. Так тихо...
  EN FS: A snowy night in the city. So quiet...
  ua FS: Засніжена ніч у місті. Так тихо...
  EN TP: a snowy forest at night
  ua TP: засніжений ліс уночі
  EN FP: a snowy street at night
  ua FP: засніжена вулиця вночі
2048 | wild (adjective): living in nature, not kept by people | loc: дикий
  EN TS: This wolf is wild!
  ua TS: Цей вовк дикий!
  EN FS: This dog is wild!
  ua FS: Цей пес дикий!
  EN TP: a wild wolf
  ua TP: дикий вовк
  EN FP: a wild party
  ua FP: дика вечірка
2049 | cozy (adjective): warm, comfortable and inviting | loc: затишний
  EN TS: The reading corner looks cozy.
  ua TS: Куточок для читання виглядає затишним.
  EN FS: The kitchen corner looks cozy.
  ua FS: Кухонний куточок виглядає затишним.
  EN TP: a cozy reading corner
  ua TP: затишний куточок для читання
  EN FP: a cozy wool jumper
  ua FP: затишний вовняний светр
2052 | mug (noun): a big cup with a handle for hot drinks | loc: кухоль
  EN TS: The mug is on a pile of books.
  ua TS: Кухоль стоїть на купі книжок.
  EN FS: The mug is on a pile of boxes.
  ua FS: Кухоль стоїть на купі коробок.
  EN TP: a silver mug on books
  ua TP: срібний кухоль на книжках
  EN FP: a mug of cold milk
  ua FP: кухоль холодного молока
2053 | shelf (noun): a flat horizontal surface for holding objects | loc: полиця
  EN TS: Bottles fill every shelf.
  ua TS: Пляшки заповнюють кожну полицю.
  EN FS: Books fill every shelf.
  ua FS: Книжки заповнюють кожну полицю.
  EN TP: shelves of old bottles
  ua TP: полиці зі старими пляшками
  EN FP: shelves of old books
  ua FP: полиці зі старими книжками
2055 | poison (noun): something that harms you if you drink it | loc: отрута
  EN TS: The "Rejuvenation" is poison.
  ua TS: «Омолодження» — це отрута.
  EN FS: The "Rejuvenation" is juice.
  ua FS: «Омолодження» — це сік.
  EN TP: a bottle of poison
  ua TP: пляшка отрути
  EN FP: a bottle of wine
  ua FP: пляшка вина
2056 | full (adjective): containing as much as is possible | loc: повний
  EN TS: The shelves are full of books.
  ua TS: Полиці повні книжок.
  EN FS: The shelves are full of jars.
  ua FS: Полиці повні банок.
  EN TP: shelves full of old books
  ua TP: полиці, повні старих книжок
  EN FP: shelves full of old toys
  ua FP: полиці, повні старих іграшок
2057 | chimney (noun): a pipe on a roof that lets smoke out | loc: димар
  EN TS: The chimney is made of stone.
  ua TS: Димар кам'яний.
  EN FS: The chimney is made of metal.
  ua FS: Димар металевий.
  EN TP: a stone chimney in snow
  ua TP: кам'яний димар у снігу
  EN FP: cleaning the chimney
  ua FP: чистити димар
2058 | reach (verb): to move your arm forward to touch something | loc: дотягнутися
  EN TS: A bear is reaching for a star.
  ua TS: Ведмідь намагається дотягнутися до зірки.
  EN FS: A bear is reaching for a bird.
  ua FS: Ведмідь намагається дотягнутися до пташки.
  EN TP: reaching for a star
  ua TP: дотягнутися до зірки
  EN FP: reaching for the honey
  ua FP: дотягнутися до меду
2059 | sunlight (noun): the light that comes from the sun | loc: сонячне світло
  EN TS: Sunlight hits one side only.
  ua TS: Сонячне світло падає лише з одного боку.
  EN FS: Moonlight hits one side only.
  ua FS: Місячне світло падає лише з одного боку.
  EN TP: branches in bright sunlight
  ua TP: гілки в яскравому сонячному світлі
  EN FP: sunlight on the water
  ua FP: сонячне світло на воді
2060 | skis (noun): a pair of long narrow boards for moving on snow | loc: лижі
  EN TS: Red and yellow skis, so cool.
  ua TS: Червоно-жовті лижі, круто.
  EN FS: Blue and white skis, so cool.
  ua FS: Синьо-білі лижі, круто.
  EN TP: skis standing in the snow
  ua TP: лижі стоять у снігу
  EN FP: skis on a car roof
  ua FP: лижі на даху авто
2061 | galaxy (noun): a huge group of stars and glowing dust | loc: галактика
  EN TS: The galaxy is showing off.
  ua TS: Галактика хизується.
  EN FS: The moon is showing off.
  ua FS: Місяць хизується.
  EN TP: a glowing purple galaxy
  ua TP: сяйлива фіолетова галактика
  EN FP: a galaxy on a T-shirt
  ua FP: галактика на футболці
2062 | balance (verb): to keep something steady so it does not fall | loc: балансувати
  EN TS: Someone balanced these stones.
  ua TS: Хтось збалансував ці камені.
  EN FS: Someone balanced these cups.
  ua FS: Хтось збалансував ці чашки.
  EN TP: stones balanced in a tower
  ua TP: вежа зі збалансованих каменів
  EN FP: to balance on one leg
  ua FP: балансувати на одній нозі
2064 | snow globe (noun): a glass ball with a tiny scene and snow inside | loc: снігова куля
  EN TS: The snow globe has a church.
  ua TS: У сніговій кулі церква.
  EN FS: The snow globe has a castle.
  ua FS: У сніговій кулі замок.
  EN TP: a glowing snow globe
  ua TP: сяйлива снігова куля
  EN FP: a broken snow globe
  ua FP: розбита снігова куля
2067 | lamppost (noun): a tall street pole with a light on top | loc: ліхтарний стовп
  EN TS: One lamppost, lots of snow.
  ua TS: Один ліхтарний стовп, багато снігу.
  EN FS: One lamppost, lots of rain.
  ua FS: Один ліхтарний стовп, багато дощу.
  EN TP: a glowing lamppost
  ua TP: ліхтарний стовп, що світиться
  EN FP: a dog by a lamppost
  ua FP: пес біля ліхтарного стовпа
2068 | door (noun): the opening in a wall you enter or leave through | loc: двері
  EN TS: The red door is open.
  ua TS: Червоні двері відчинені.
  EN FS: The blue door is open.
  ua FS: Сині двері відчинені.
  EN TP: an open red door
  ua TP: відчинені червоні двері
  EN FP: a red garage door
  ua FP: червоні двері гаража
2069 | reindeer (noun): a large deer with antlers from the cold north | loc: північний олень
  EN TS: The reindeer had a bad flight.
  ua TS: У північного оленя був невдалий політ.
  EN FS: The reindeer had a fun flight.
  ua FS: У північного оленя був веселий політ.
  EN TP: reindeer stuck on a turbine
  ua TP: північний олень застряг на вітротурбіні
  EN FP: reindeer pulling a sleigh
  ua FP: північні олені тягнуть сани
2070 | electric guitar (noun): a guitar that needs an amplifier to be heard | loc: електрогітара
  EN TS: The electric guitar is a rocket!
  ua TS: Електрогітара — це ракета!
  EN FS: The electric guitar is sinking!
  ua FS: Електрогітара тоне!
  EN TP: an electric guitar taking off
  ua TP: електрогітара злітає
  EN FP: an electric guitar on stage
  ua FP: електрогітара на сцені
2071 | vintage (adjective): old but classic and high quality | loc: вінтажний
  EN TS: Nice vintage car, so festive.
  ua TS: Гарне вінтажне авто, так святково.
  EN FS: Nice vintage van, so festive.
  ua FS: Гарний вінтажний фургон, так святково.
  EN TP: a vintage red car
  ua TP: вінтажне червоне авто
  EN FP: a vintage red dress
  ua FP: вінтажна червона сукня
2072 | cable (noun): a thick wire that carries power or data | loc: кабель
  EN TS: Cables cover the whole room!
  ua TS: Кабелі вкривають усю кімнату!
  EN FS: Plants cover the whole room!
  ua FS: Рослини вкривають усю кімнату!
  EN TP: glowing blue cables
  ua TP: сяйливі сині кабелі
  EN FP: cables on a bridge
  ua FP: кабелі на мосту
2073 | shine (verb): to be bright by casting or reflecting light | loc: сяяти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Look, the sun is shining in!
  ua TS: Дивись, сонце сяє прямо сюди!
  EN FS: Look, the moon is shining in!
  ua FS: Дивись, місяць сяє прямо сюди!
  EN TP: sunlight shining in
  ua TP: сонце сяє у вікно
  EN FP: moonlight shining in
  ua FP: місяць сяє у вікно
2075 | windowsill (noun): the flat shelf at the bottom of a window | loc: підвіконня
  EN TS: Books sit on the windowsill.
  ua TS: На підвіконні лежать книжки.
  EN FS: Cats sit on the windowsill.
  ua FS: На підвіконні сидять коти.
  EN TP: books on a windowsill
  ua TP: книжки на підвіконні
  EN FP: plants on a windowsill
  ua FP: рослини на підвіконні
2076 | literature (noun): written works such as novels, poems and stories | loc: література
  EN TS: So much literature, so little time.
  ua TS: Стільки літератури, так мало часу.
  EN FS: So many pizzas, so little time.
  ua FS: Стільки піци, так мало часу.
  EN TP: shelves of old literature
  ua TP: полиці зі старою літературою
  EN FP: literature on a phone
  ua FP: література в телефоні
2077 | stare (verb): to look at something for a long time | loc: витріщатися
  EN TS: The owl is staring at me!
  ua TS: Сова витріщається на мене!
  EN FS: The cat is staring at me!
  ua FS: Кіт витріщається на мене!
  EN TP: staring at the viewer
  ua TP: витріщається на глядача
  EN FP: staring at the moon
  ua FP: витріщається на місяць
2078 | flame (noun): the bright burning part of a fire or candle | loc: полум'я
  EN TS: Two flames light the book.
  ua TS: Два язики полум'я освітлюють книжку.
  EN FS: Three flames light the book.
  ua FS: Три язики полум'я освітлюють книжку.
  EN TP: two candle flames
  ua TP: два язики полум'я свічок
  EN FP: flames in a fireplace
  ua FP: полум'я в каміні
2079 | wooden (adjective): made of wood | loc: дерев'яний
  EN TS: Everything here is wooden.
  ua TS: Тут усе дерев'яне.
  EN FS: Everything here is plastic.
  ua FS: Тут усе пластикове.
  EN TP: tall wooden bookcases
  ua TP: високі дерев'яні книжкові шафи
  EN FP: tall wooden ladders
  ua FP: високі дерев'яні драбини
2080 | pagoda (noun): an Asian temple with tiered curved roofs | loc: пагода
  EN TS: Snow is falling on the pagoda.
  ua TS: На пагоду падає сніг.
  EN FS: Rain is falling on the pagoda.
  ua FS: На пагоду падає дощ.
  EN TP: a red pagoda in snow
  ua TP: червона пагода в снігу
  EN FP: a pagoda in the jungle
  ua FP: пагода в джунглях
2081 | stepping stones (noun): flat stones you step on to cross water | loc: камені для переходу
  EN TS: Stepping stones cross a lake.
  ua TS: Камені для переходу перетинають озеро.
  EN FS: Stepping stones cross a road.
  ua FS: Камені для переходу перетинають дорогу.
  EN TP: stepping stones across water
  ua TP: камені для переходу через воду
  EN FP: stepping stones in a garden
  ua FP: камені для переходу в саду
2082 | cane (noun): a thin stick you lean on while walking | loc: тростина
  EN TS: He is holding a thin cane.
  ua TS: Він тримає тонку тростину.
  EN FS: He is holding a thin pipe.
  ua FS: Він тримає тонку люльку.
  EN TP: holding a walking cane
  ua TP: тримає тростину для ходьби
  EN FP: a cane in the snow
  ua FP: тростина в снігу
2084 | railway (noun): the line that runs trains for passengers | loc: залізниця
  EN TS: A train on a wet railway.
  ua TS: Потяг на мокрій залізниці.
  EN FS: A train on a dry railway.
  ua FS: Потяг на сухій залізниці.
  EN TP: a railway at night
  ua TP: залізниця вночі
  EN FP: a railway in the desert
  ua FP: залізниця в пустелі
2086 | festive (adjective): cheerful and decorated for a celebration | loc: святковий
  EN TS: The street looks so festive!
  ua TS: Вулиця виглядає так святково!
  EN FS: The street looks so sunny!
  ua FS: Вулиця виглядає так сонячно!
  EN TP: a festive snowy street
  ua TP: святкова засніжена вулиця
  EN FP: a festive dinner table
  ua FP: святковий обідній стіл
2087 | skyline (noun): the outline of a city against the sky | loc: міський обрій
  EN TS: A foggy steampunk skyline.
  ua TS: Туманний стімпанковий міський обрій.
  EN FS: A foggy desert skyline.
  ua FS: Туманний пустельний міський обрій.
  EN TP: a skyline in the fog
  ua TP: міський обрій у тумані
  EN FP: a skyline at midnight
  ua FP: міський обрій опівночі
2088 | handsome (adjective): good-looking, used about a man | loc: вродливий
  EN TS: The handsome man has a beard.
  ua TS: У вродливого чоловіка борода.
  EN FS: The handsome man has glasses.
  ua FS: У вродливого чоловіка окуляри.
  EN TP: a handsome bearded man
  ua TP: вродливий бородатий чоловік
  EN FP: a handsome man with glasses
  ua FP: вродливий чоловік в окулярах
2089 | antlers (noun): the branching horns on a deer's head | loc: роги
  EN TS: Man, those antlers are huge.
  ua TS: Чувак, ці роги величезні.
  EN FS: Man, those antlers are tiny.
  ua FS: Чувак, ці роги крихітні.
  EN TP: huge branching antlers
  ua TP: величезні розлогі роги
  EN FP: antlers on the wall
  ua FP: роги на стіні
2091 | pine tree (noun): a tall tree with needles and cones | loc: сосна
  EN TS: The pine tree stands alone.
  ua TS: Сосна стоїть сама-самісінька.
  EN FS: The palm tree stands alone.
  ua FS: Пальма стоїть сама-самісінька.
  EN TP: a frosty pine tree
  ua TP: сосна в інеї
  EN FP: a pine tree with lights
  ua FP: сосна з гірляндами
2092 | fluffy (adjective): soft and light, like fur or feathers | loc: пухнастий
  EN TS: What a fluffy owl!
  ua TS: Яка пухнаста сова!
  EN FS: What a fluffy cat!
  ua FS: Який пухнастий кіт!
  EN TP: a fluffy blue owl
  ua TP: пухнаста синя сова
  EN FP: a fluffy blue blanket
  ua FP: пухнаста синя ковдра
2093 | green (adjective): the color between blue and yellow | loc: зелений
  EN TS: The whole city is green.
  ua TS: Усе місто зелене.
  EN FS: The whole city is grey.
  ua FS: Усе місто сіре.
  EN TP: green towers full of trees
  ua TP: зелені вежі, повні дерев
  EN FP: green paint on the towers
  ua FP: зелена фарба на вежах
2095 | long (adjective): measuring a lot from one end to the other | loc: довгий
  EN TS: Her long hair is teal.
  ua TS: Її довге волосся бірюзове.
  EN FS: Her long hair is black.
  ua FS: Її довге волосся чорне.
  EN TP: long flowing teal hair
  ua TP: довге бірюзове волосся
  EN FP: a long walk
  ua FP: довга прогулянка
2096 | red (adjective): the color at the end of the spectrum | loc: червоний
  EN TS: Even the sky is red!
  ua TS: Навіть небо червоне!
  EN FS: Even the sky is green!
  ua FS: Навіть небо зелене!
  EN TP: a red desert sky
  ua TP: червоне небо пустелі
  EN FP: a red sports car
  ua FP: червоне спортивне авто
2097 | ear (noun): the part of your head you hear with | loc: вухо
  EN TS: Those ears are bigger than its head!
  ua TS: Ці вуха більші за його голову!
  EN FS: Those eyes are bigger than its head!
  ua FS: Ці очі більші за його голову!
  EN TP: enormous round ears
  ua TP: величезні круглі вуха
  EN FP: ears under a hat
  ua FP: вуха під шапкою
2099 | tree house (noun): a small hut built high up among branches | loc: будиночок на дереві
  EN TS: This tree house is so cool!
  ua TS: Цей будиночок на дереві такий крутий!
  EN FS: This dog house is so cool!
  ua FS: Ця собача будка така крута!
  EN TP: a jungle tree house
  ua TP: будиночок на дереві в джунглях
  EN FP: a garden tree house
  ua FP: будиночок на дереві в саду
2100 | gown (noun): a long formal dress worn to a ball | loc: бальна сукня
  EN TS: Her gown is bigger than the garden!
  ua TS: Її бальна сукня більша за сад!
  EN FS: Her hat is bigger than the garden!
  ua FS: Її капелюх більший за сад!
  EN TP: a huge blue ball gown
  ua TP: величезна блакитна бальна сукня
  EN FP: a gown on a hanger
  ua FP: бальна сукня на вішаку
2101 | together (adverb): with each other, close or touching | loc: разом
  EN TS: They are walking together.
  ua TS: Вони гуляють разом.
  EN FS: They are running together.
  ua FS: Вони бігають разом.
  EN TP: walking close together
  ua TP: ідуть разом пліч-о-пліч
  EN FP: sitting together in a cafe
  ua FP: сидять разом у кав'ярні
2102 | collection (noun): a large group of similar things kept together | loc: колекція
  EN TS: What a book collection!
  ua TS: Оце колекція книжок!
  EN FS: What a shoe collection!
  ua FS: Оце колекція взуття!
  EN TP: a collection of old books
  ua TP: колекція старих книжок
  EN FP: a collection of old coins
  ua FP: колекція старих монет
2104 | jewelry (noun): necklaces, earrings and rings that you wear | loc: прикраси
  EN TS: So much gold jewelry!
  ua TS: Скільки золотих прикрас!
  EN FS: So much silver jewelry!
  ua FS: Скільки срібних прикрас!
  EN TP: covered in gold jewelry
  ua TP: уся в золотих прикрасах
  EN FP: selling gold jewelry
  ua FP: продає золоті прикраси
2105 | pile (noun): a heap of things placed on top of each other | loc: купа
  EN TS: The piles of books might fall.
  ua TS: Купи книжок можуть упасти.
  EN FS: The piles of cups might fall.
  ua FS: Купи чашок можуть упасти.
  EN TP: leaning piles of books
  ua TP: похилені купи книжок
  EN FP: a pile of clothes
  ua FP: купа одягу
2107 | spaceship (noun): a large vehicle that travels through space | loc: космічний корабель
  EN TS: Where is everyone on this spaceship?
  ua TS: Де всі на цьому космічному кораблі?
  EN FS: Where is everyone on this train?
  ua FS: Де всі в цьому потязі?
  EN TP: inside a spaceship
  ua TP: всередині космічного корабля
  EN FP: a spaceship landing
  ua FP: космічний корабель сідає
2108 | pipe (noun): a tube that carries water or gas | loc: труба
  EN TS: Pipes run along the ceiling.
  ua TS: Труби тягнуться вздовж стелі.
  EN FS: Wires run along the ceiling.
  ua FS: Дроти тягнуться вздовж стелі.
  EN TP: pipes along the ceiling
  ua TP: труби вздовж стелі
  EN FP: pipes under the floor
  ua FP: труби під підлогою
2109 | tidy (adjective): arranged neatly and in good order | loc: охайний
  EN TS: The books stand in tidy rows.
  ua TS: Книжки стоять охайними рядами.
  EN FS: The cups stand in tidy rows.
  ua FS: Чашки стоять охайними рядами.
  EN TP: tidy rows of books
  ua TP: охайні ряди книжок
  EN FP: a tidy desk
  ua FP: охайний стіл
2110 | silhouette (noun): a dark outline against a bright background | loc: силует
  EN TS: Dark silhouette, neon city. Batman?
  ua TS: Темний силует, неонове місто. Бетмен?
  EN FS: Dark silhouette, sunny beach. Batman?
  ua FS: Темний силует, сонячний пляж. Бетмен?
  EN TP: a silhouette in a coat
  ua TP: силует у плащі
  EN FP: a silhouette of a cat
  ua FP: силует кота
2112 | blazer (noun): a smart formal jacket worn over a shirt | loc: піджак
  EN TS: Her blazer is bright yellow.
  ua TS: Її піджак яскраво-жовтий.
  EN FS: Her blazer is dark green.
  ua FS: Її піджак темно-зелений.
  EN TP: a bright yellow blazer
  ua TP: яскраво-жовтий піджак
  EN FP: taking off a blazer
  ua FP: знімає піджак
2113 | yellow (adjective): the color between green and orange | loc: жовтий
  EN TS: The flowers are bright yellow.
  ua TS: Квіти яскраво-жовті.
  EN FS: The flowers are bright purple.
  ua FS: Квіти яскраво-фіолетові.
  EN TP: a dove on yellow flowers
  ua TP: голуб на жовтих квітах
  EN FP: yellow flowers in a vase
  ua FP: жовті квіти у вазі
2114 | across (preposition): from one side to the other side | loc: через
  EN TS: A bridge across the stream.
  ua TS: Міст через струмок.
  EN FS: A bridge across the road.
  ua FS: Міст через дорогу.
  EN TP: a bridge across a stream
  ua TP: міст через струмок
  EN FP: a house across the street
  ua FP: будинок через дорогу
2115 | yoga (noun): calm stretching poses with slow breathing | loc: йога
  EN TS: A calm yoga pose.
  ua TS: Спокійна поза йоги.
  EN FS: A calm dance pose.
  ua FS: Спокійна танцювальна поза.
  EN TP: a cross-legged yoga pose
  ua TP: поза йоги зі схрещеними ногами
  EN FP: yoga on a paddleboard
  ua FP: йога на падлборді
2116 | seaweed (noun): green plants that grow in the sea | loc: морські водорості
  EN TS: Seaweed is floating around her.
  ua TS: Навколо неї плавають морські водорості.
  EN FS: Plastic is floating around her.
  ua FS: Навколо неї плаває пластик.
  EN TP: seaweed around her head
  ua TP: морські водорості навколо голови
  EN FP: seaweed on a sushi roll
  ua FP: морські водорості на суші
2117 | pocket watch (noun): a round watch carried on a chain | loc: кишеньковий годинник
  EN TS: No phone, just a pocket watch.
  ua TS: Жодного телефона, лише кишеньковий годинник.
  EN FS: No phone, just a wrist watch.
  ua FS: Жодного телефона, лише наручний годинник.
  EN TP: a golden pocket watch
  ua TP: золотий кишеньковий годинник
  EN FP: checking a pocket watch
  ua FP: дивиться на кишеньковий годинник
2118 | fancy (adjective): decorated, expensive-looking and not plain | loc: вишуканий
  EN TS: Such fancy golden shops!
  ua TS: Які вишукані золоті крамниці!
  EN FS: Such fancy silver shops!
  ua FS: Які вишукані срібні крамниці!
  EN TP: fancy golden shopfronts
  ua TP: вишукані золоті вітрини
  EN FP: a fancy dress party
  ua FP: вечірка у вишуканих костюмах
2119 | pattern (noun): a repeated design of shapes and colors | loc: візерунок
  EN TS: The owl has red patterns.
  ua TS: У сови червоні візерунки.
  EN FS: The owl has green patterns.
  ua FS: У сови зелені візерунки.
  EN TP: feather patterns
  ua TP: візерунки на пір'ї
  EN FP: patterns on a dress
  ua FP: візерунки на сукні
2120 | perch (verb): to sit on a branch or a ledge, like a bird | loc: сидіти на гілці
  EN TS: A bird is perched on a twig.
  ua TS: Пташка сидить на гілці.
  EN FS: A bird is perched on a wire.
  ua FS: Пташка сидить на дроті.
  EN TP: perched on a blossom branch
  ua TP: сидить на квітучій гілці
  EN FP: perched on a window sill
  ua FP: сидить на підвіконні
2121 | heavy (adjective): of great physical weight | loc: важкий
  EN TS: Heavy rocks, perfect balance.
  ua TS: Важке каміння, ідеальний баланс.
  EN FS: Heavy bricks, perfect balance.
  ua FS: Важкі цеглини, ідеальний баланс.
  EN TP: a tower of heavy rocks
  ua TP: вежа з важкого каміння
  EN FP: a heavy bag of rocks
  ua FP: важка торба каміння
2123 | factory (noun): a building where machines make things | loc: фабрика
  EN TS: This factory touches the sky.
  ua TS: Ця фабрика торкається неба.
  EN FS: This factory touches the sea.
  ua FS: Ця фабрика торкається моря.
  EN TP: a giant steampunk factory
  ua TP: гігантська стімпанк-фабрика
  EN FP: a tiny steampunk factory
  ua FP: крихітна стімпанк-фабрика
2124 | road (noun): an open public way for travel by vehicles | loc: дорога
  EN TS: She is walking on a wet road.
  ua TS: Вона йде мокрою дорогою.
  EN FS: She is walking on a wet beach.
  ua FS: Вона йде мокрим пляжем.
  EN TP: walking down a country road
  ua TP: іде сільською дорогою
  EN FP: driving down a country road
  ua FP: їде сільською дорогою
2126 | spill (verb): to let liquid fall out of a container | loc: розлити
  EN TS: The kitten spilled the coffee!
  ua TS: Кошеня розлило каву!
  EN FS: The kitten spilled the milk!
  ua FS: Кошеня розлило молоко!
  EN TP: spilled coffee on the table
  ua TP: розлита кава на столі
  EN FP: spilling paint on the floor
  ua FP: розлита фарба на підлозі
2127 | table (noun): furniture with a flat top and legs | loc: стіл | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: There is a book on the table.
  ua TS: На столі лежить книжка.
  EN FS: There is a cat on the table.
  ua FS: На столі сидить кіт.
  EN TP: a carved wooden table
  ua TP: різьблений дерев'яний стіл
  EN FP: a table by the fire
  ua FP: стіл біля каміна
2128 | shoot (verb): to hit something with a missile from a weapon | loc: стріляти
  EN TS: He is shooting from a chariot!
  ua TS: Він стріляє з колісниці!
  EN FS: He is shooting from a boat!
  ua FS: Він стріляє з човна!
  EN TP: shooting an arrow
  ua TP: стріляє з лука
  EN FP: shooting a photo
  ua FP: знімає фото
2132 | abandoned (adjective): left empty and no longer used | loc: покинутий
  EN TS: The library is abandoned.
  ua TS: Бібліотека покинута.
  EN FS: The school is abandoned.
  ua FS: Школа покинута.
  EN TP: an abandoned library
  ua TP: покинута бібліотека
  EN FP: an abandoned car
  ua FP: покинуте авто
2133 | pillar (noun): a tall upright post of stone | loc: стовп
  EN TS: Stone pillars in the snow.
  ua TS: Кам'яні стовпи в снігу.
  EN FS: Stone pillars in the sand.
  ua FS: Кам'яні стовпи в піску.
  EN TP: pillars of stacked stones
  ua TP: стовпи зі складених каменів
  EN FP: a pillar of a temple
  ua FP: колона храму
2134 | empress (noun): a woman who rules an empire | loc: імператриця
  EN TS: The empress is not amused.
  ua TS: Імператриці не смішно.
  EN FS: The empress is very amused.
  ua FS: Імператриці дуже смішно.
  EN TP: a stern empress
  ua TP: сувора імператриця
  EN FP: an empress on a horse
  ua FP: імператриця на коні
2135 | swirl (noun): a curling, spiral shape | loc: завиток
  EN TS: This cat is made of swirls.
  ua TS: Цей кіт складається із завитків.
  EN FS: This cat is made of squares.
  ua FS: Цей кіт складається з квадратів.
  EN TP: golden swirls
  ua TP: золоті завитки
  EN FP: swirls of smoke
  ua FP: завитки диму
2136 | glove (noun): a covering for your hand with fingers | loc: рукавичка
  EN TS: The red gloves look great.
  ua TS: Червоні рукавички виглядають чудово.
  EN FS: The blue gloves look great.
  ua FS: Сині рукавички виглядають чудово.
  EN TP: red space gloves
  ua TP: червоні космічні рукавички
  EN FP: red boxing gloves
  ua FP: червоні боксерські рукавички
2137 | halo (noun): a ring of light around a holy figure's head | loc: німб
  EN TS: Golden halo? Very stylish.
  ua TS: Золотий німб? Дуже стильно.
  EN FS: Silver halo? Very stylish.
  ua FS: Срібний німб? Дуже стильно.
  EN TP: a golden halo crown
  ua TP: золотий німб-корона
  EN FP: a halo of dark smoke
  ua FP: німб із темного диму
2139 | laser (noun): a narrow beam of strong light from a machine | loc: лазер
  EN TS: Laser beams glow behind her.
  ua TS: За нею сяють промені лазерів.
  EN FS: Candles glow behind her.
  ua FS: За нею сяють свічки.
  EN TP: neon laser beams
  ua TP: неонові промені лазера
  EN FP: a laser pointer for cats
  ua FP: лазерна указка для котів
2140 | machine (noun): a thing with moving metal parts built to work | loc: машина
  EN TS: This place is one big machine.
  ua TS: Це місце — одна велика машина.
  EN FS: This place is one big garden.
  ua FS: Це місце — один великий сад.
  EN TP: a huge rusty machine
  ua TP: величезна іржава машина
  EN FP: a huge washing machine
  ua FP: величезна пральна машина
2141 | basement (noun): a room below ground level in a building | loc: підвал
  EN TS: Something is glowing in the basement.
  ua TS: У підвалі щось світиться.
  EN FS: Something is burning in the basement.
  ua FS: У підвалі щось горить.
  EN TP: an open basement door
  ua TP: відчинені двері підвалу
  EN FP: a basement full of boxes
  ua FP: підвал, повний коробок
2143 | boulder (noun): a very large rounded rock | loc: валун
  EN TS: Boulders stacked like Lego.
  ua TS: Валуни складені, як Лего.
  EN FS: Bricks stacked like Lego.
  ua FS: Цеглини складені, як Лего.
  EN TP: a tower of boulders
  ua TP: вежа з валунів
  EN FP: a boulder rolling downhill
  ua FP: валун котиться з гори
2144 | t-shirt (noun): a simple top with short sleeves and no collar | loc: футболка
  EN TS: She has a white t-shirt on.
  ua TS: На ній біла футболка.
  EN FS: She has a black t-shirt on.
  ua FS: На ній чорна футболка.
  EN TP: a white t-shirt and jacket
  ua TP: біла футболка й куртка
  EN FP: a t-shirt on a hanger
  ua FP: футболка на вішаку
2146 | france (noun): the European country whose capital is Paris | loc: Франція
  EN TS: France has a purple tower.
  ua TS: У Франції є фіолетова вежа.
  EN FS: France has a green tower.
  ua FS: У Франції є зелена вежа.
  EN TP: a tower in France
  ua TP: вежа у Франції
  EN FP: a bridge in France
  ua FP: міст у Франції
2149 | ridge (noun): the long top edge of a mountain or hill | loc: хребет
  EN TS: Ridge after ridge, all grey.
  ua TS: Хребет за хребтом, усе сіре.
  EN FS: Ridge after ridge, all green.
  ua FS: Хребет за хребтом, усе зелене.
  EN TP: rows of mountain ridges
  ua TP: ряди гірських хребтів
  EN FP: a ridge covered in snow
  ua FP: хребет, укритий снігом
2150 | ponytail (noun): hair tied back so it hangs like a tail | loc: хвіст
  EN TS: Ponytail up. She will go out there.
  ua TS: Хвіст зібрано. Вона таки вийде туди.
  EN FS: Hair down. She will go out there.
  ua FS: Волосся розпущено. Вона таки вийде туди.
  EN TP: a ponytail at the window
  ua TP: зачіска-хвіст біля вікна
  EN FP: a ponytail on a horse
  ua FP: хвіст коня
2151 | crescent (noun): the curved sliver shape of a moon | loc: півмісяць
  EN TS: The crescent moon is chilling.
  ua TS: Півмісяць чилить.
  EN FS: The full moon is chilling.
  ua FS: Повний місяць чилить.
  EN TP: a crescent moon in clouds
  ua TP: півмісяць у хмарах
  EN FP: a crescent moon at noon
  ua FP: півмісяць опівдні
2152 | lipstick (noun): colour you paint on your lips | loc: помада
  EN TS: Her lipstick is bright red.
  ua TS: Її помада яскраво-червона.
  EN FS: Her lipstick is bright pink.
  ua FS: Її помада яскраво-рожева.
  EN TP: bright red lipstick
  ua TP: яскраво-червона помада
  EN FP: bright pink lipstick
  ua FP: яскраво-рожева помада
2153 | china (noun): a very big country in East Asia | loc: Китай
  EN TS: China has a flying dragon!
  ua TS: У Китаї летючий дракон!
  EN FS: China has a sleeping dragon!
  ua FS: У Китаї сплячий дракон!
  EN TP: a dragon from China
  ua TP: дракон із Китаю
  EN FP: a tiger from China
  ua FP: тигр із Китаю
2154 | general (noun): a top military commander who leads an army | loc: генерал
  EN TS: The general's beard is white.
  ua TS: Борода генерала біла.
  EN FS: The general's beard is black.
  ua FS: Борода генерала чорна.
  EN TP: an old general in armour
  ua TP: старий генерал в обладунках
  EN FP: a young general in armour
  ua FP: молодий генерал в обладунках
